


Partners In Care

























 






Partners In Care






Home
About
Leadership
Clients & Services
Provider Network
News
Contact Us


Delivering Better Health, Better Care at Lower Cost...

             









Home







 Results 




 Provider Spotlight 




 Testimonials 
























 © 2013 Partners In Care | 2 Tower Center Blvd., Tower 2, 12th Floor East Brunswick, NJ 08816 | Phone:  (732) 246 0291 | Fax: (732) 745 4798 







Contact Us


























 






Partners In Care






Home
About
Leadership
Clients & Services
Provider Network
News
Contact Us


Delivering Better Health, Better Care at Lower Cost...

      









Contact Us




		Contact Us




		2 Tower Center Blvd.
		Tower 2, 12th Floor
		East Brunswick, NJ 08816
	

		Phone: (732) 246-0291 
		    Fax: (732) 745-4798


		For more information about our provider network
		or our healthcare management services, please contact
us at (732) 246-0291 or contact@piccorp.com.
	

		For general inquiries, you may contact us via the contact form.
	

		Thanks and we look forward to hearing from you.
	











 Send us a Message 


Name:  
Email:  
Phone #:  
Message
 

























 © 2013 Partners In Care | 2 Tower Center Blvd., Tower 2, 12th Floor East Brunswick, NJ 08816 | Phone:  (732) 246 0291 | Fax: (732) 745 4798 







News


























 






Partners In Care






Home
About
Leadership
Clients & Services
Provider Network
News
Contact Us


Delivering Better Health, Better Care at Lower Cost...

      









News





Latest News
Press Releases



PIC Patient Experience Survey
 December 22nd, 2016 by Partners In Care 

 

The most successful medical practices recognize that the keys to their success are in understanding and responding to their patients. They recognize that strong financial results depend on understanding their patients’ needs and concerns. Satisfied patients are more likely to recommend your practice to friends and family, and less likely to leave for a competitor, or file a malpractice claim. Measuring patient satisfaction is also a method for monitoring and improving the delivery of care, an important component of accountable care. 
In order to assist our member primary care practices in assessing their patients’ experience and to allow Partners In Care to report aggregated patient experience metrics to our contracted insurance carriers, Partners In Care has developed a custom Patient Experience Survey. The survey questions are adapted from the Consumer Assessment of Healthcare Providers and Systems (CAHPS) family of surveys. The questions correspond to the metrics that are contained in our accountable care contracts and include questions that have been shown to statistically correlate with positive provider ratings.
Click here to download the survey. If you have not done so already, please take the time to review the survey with your colleagues and staff members. Also, please present the survey to your patients at the conclusion of their visits, and forward the completed surveys back to Partners In Care. Feedback from the surveys will be provided back to all participating practices periodically. 
No Comments | Filed under: News | Tags: No Tags


Partners In Care Newsletter
 April 20th, 2016 by Partners In Care 

 

We launched a newsletter to keep our providers informed of important developments affecting their practices and the latest healthcare industry news.
Click here to read the current issue.
No Comments | Filed under: News | Tags: No Tags


We’re Partnering with Data Analytics Industry Leader, Wellcentive, to Strengthen our Population Health Management Platform
 March 16th, 2016 by Partners In Care 

 


	Click here to read some of the media coverage.
No Comments | Filed under: News | Tags: No Tags


50 Physicians from CentraState Healthcare Partners PHO Join Our ACO
 March 15th, 2016 by Partners In Care 

 


	Partners In Care is proud to welcome physicians from CentraState Healthcare Partners PHO to our ACO. To learn more about Partners In Care ACO, Inc., please visit www.partnersincareaco.com


Click here to read the NJBIZ article on the addition of CentraState providers to our ACO.
No Comments | Filed under: News | Tags: No Tags


Medicare ACOs Growing in New Jersey- Partners In Care ACO, an Early Pioneer, Celebrates Its 2- Year Anniversary!
 January 15th, 2016 by Partners In Care 

 


Click here to read the MyCentralJersey.com article on the growth of ACOs in NJ
No Comments | Filed under: News | Tags: No Tags


Congratulations to Our Provider Reliance Medical Group on Launching a Physician Assistant Studies Master’s Program with Stockton State College and Philadelphia University!
 July 10th, 2014 by Partners In Care 

 


Click here to learn more about this groundbreaking program!
No Comments | Filed under: News | Tags: No Tags


Partners In Care and New Jersey Health Information Technology Extension Center (NJ-HITEC) Form Major Health IT Partnership
 May 22nd, 2014 by Partners In Care 

 


Click here to read the NJBIZ article on the partnership.


Click here to read the New Brunswick Today article on the partnership.
No Comments | Filed under: News | Tags: No Tags


Major News! Partners In Care Providers Dr. Niranjan Rao and Dr. Richard Angrist Appointed by Governor Christie to the NJ State Board of Medical Examiners!
 April 15th, 2014 by Partners In Care 

 


To sign up or learn more about our 650-plus provider network click here.
No Comments | Filed under: News Uncategorized | Tags: No Tags


Big News! Partners In Care and Cigna Expand Their Collaborative Accountable Care Program to Thousands More
 January 27th, 2014 by Partners In Care 

 


Click here to read the NJBIZ article on the big expansion.
No Comments | Filed under: News | Tags: No Tags


Horizon Blue Cross Blue Shield of New Jersey and Partners In Care Launch Collaborative ACO to Deliver Better Health Care at Lower Costs to 20,000 Members
 January 7th, 2014 by Partners In Care 

 


Click here to read the NJBIZ article on the new ACO.
No Comments | Filed under: News | Tags: No Tags


MEDICARE NAMES PARTNERS IN CARE ACO, INC. AMONG EIGHT NEW ACOs IN NEW JERSEY
 December 24th, 2013 by Partners In Care 

 


Click here to read the NJBIZ article on Partners In Care's new ACO.
No Comments | Filed under: News | Tags: No Tags


PARTNERS IN CARE PROFILED IN NJBIZ
 December 23rd, 2013 by Partners In Care 

 


Click here to read the article.
No Comments | Filed under: News | Tags: No Tags


MIDDLESEX COUNTY SELECTS PARTNERS IN CARE TO START PILOT PROGRAM TO IMPROVE EMPLOYEE HEALTH, CUT HEALTHCARE COSTS
 December 23rd, 2013 by Partners In Care 

 


Click here to read the Star Ledger article on the innovative pilot program. 
No Comments | Filed under: News | Tags: No Tags


Partners In Care Board Member, Dr. Rao, Honored by the Medical Society of New Jersey with a Lifetime Achievement Award
 September 17th, 2013 by Partners In Care 

 


We are proud that our Board member, Dr. Niranjan Rao, received a lifetime achievement award from the Medical Society of New Jersey. Dr. Rao is a board-certified vascular surgeon with over 25 years of experience and a former President of the Medical Society.  
Click here to learn more.
No Comments | Filed under: News | Tags: No Tags


Welcome New Providers
 September 10th, 2013 by Partners In Care 

 


We are pleased to welcome our new providers, Reliance Medical Group, PEMCARE and  Immedicenter.  Together, these providers have 25 offices spanning Atlantic, Camden, Cape May, Essex, Mercer, Middlesex, Monmouth, Ocean and Passaic counties.  
Click here to learn about the benefits of joining our rapidly-growing provider network.
No Comments | Filed under: News | Tags: No Tags




PARTNERS IN CARE SELECTS WELLCENTIVE TO EMPOWER POPULATION HEALTH MANAGEMENT STRATEGIES
 March 16th, 2016 by Partners In Care 
No Comments | Filed under: Press | Tags: No Tags


PARTNERS IN CARE ACO, INC. WELCOMES THE CENTRASTATE HEALTHCARE PARTNERS PHO
 March 16th, 2016 by Partners In Care 
No Comments | Filed under: Press | Tags: No Tags


SAINT PETER’S HEALTHCARE SYSTEM AND PARTNERS IN CARE REKINDLE RELATIONSHIP WITH MILESTONE PARTNERSHIP FOR EMPLOYED HOSPITAL PHYSICIANS TO JOIN THE INDEPENDENT PROVIDER NETWORK
 August 18th, 2014 by Partners In Care 
No Comments | Filed under: Press | Tags: No Tags


PARTNERS IN CARE AND NEW JERSEY HEALTH INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY EXTENSION CENTER (NJ-HITEC) ANNOUNCE MAJOR PARTNERSHIP
 May 22nd, 2014 by Partners In Care 
No Comments | Filed under: Press | Tags: No Tags


CIGNA AND PARTNERS IN CARE EXPAND ACCOUNTABLE CARE PROGRAM IN NEW JERSEY
 January 27th, 2014 by Partners In Care 
No Comments | Filed under: Press | Tags: No Tags


HORIZON BLUE CROSS BLUE SHIELD OF NJ AND PARTNERS IN CARE LAUNCH COLLABORATIVE ACO TO DELIVER BETTER HEALTHCARE AT LOWER COSTS
 January 7th, 2014 by Partners In Care 
No Comments | Filed under: Press | Tags: No Tags


MEDICARE NAMES PARTNERS IN CARE ACO, INC. AMONG EIGHT NEW ACOs IN NJ
 December 24th, 2013 by Partners In Care 
No Comments | Filed under: Press | Tags: No Tags


MIDDLESEX COUNTY JOINT HEALTH INSURANCE FUND SELECTS PARTNERS IN CARE TO LAUNCH AN INNOVATIVE PROGRAM TO IMPROVE EMPLOYEE HEALTH & REDUCE HEALTHCARE COSTS
 December 23rd, 2013 by Partners In Care 
No Comments | Filed under: Press | Tags: No Tags


PARTNERS IN CARE APPOINTS HEALTHCARE MARKETING VETERAN & AFFORDABLE CARE ACT EXPERT RALPH TANG AS CEO
 November 6th, 2013 by Partners In Care 
No Comments | Filed under: Press | Tags: No Tags































 © 2013 Partners In Care | 2 Tower Center Blvd., Tower 2, 12th Floor East Brunswick, NJ 08816 | Phone:  (732) 246 0291 | Fax: (732) 745 4798 







Testimonials


























 






Partners In Care






Home
About
Leadership
Clients & Services
Provider Network
News
Contact Us


Delivering Better Health, Better Care at Lower Cost...

      









Testimonials







Provider- Pediatrics & Family Medicine Practice
Partners In Care has not only helped us to remain independent but also thrive.





Provider- Nephrology & Hypertension Practice
I have been a provider in the Partners In Care network for 20 years…





Provider – Ophthalmology Practice
I could not be happier with my decision to join the Partners In Care provider network almost 20 years ago…





Provider – Primary Care Practice
I have been part of the Partners In Care provider network for over 10 years…





Partner – Health Insurance Broker
As an insurance broker, one of my biggest responsibilities is to ensure that my clients obtain…

























 © 2013 Partners In Care | 2 Tower Center Blvd., Tower 2, 12th Floor East Brunswick, NJ 08816 | Phone:  (732) 246 0291 | Fax: (732) 745 4798 







Provider Spotlight


























 






Partners In Care






Home
About
Leadership
Clients & Services
Provider Network
News
Contact Us


Delivering Better Health, Better Care at Lower Cost...

      








Results





Provider Spotlight





Testimonials








Provider Spotlight
by Partners In Care on July 24, 2013



Find out how one of our providers successfully transitioned from a hospital Division Chief to owner of a thriving independent primary care practice… 


Teresa Schaer, MD, FACP


	In 2008, Dr. Teresa Schaer made the unconventional decision to leave her position as Chief of the Division of Geriatrics at Saint Peter’s University Hospital to start her own private practice.  At the time, many of her colleagues were selling their practices and taking staff positions at hospitals.   A board-certified Internist and Geriatric specialist, she opened a unique concierge practice, Signature Health Solutions, centered on an integrative approach to internal and geriatric medicine.  A long-standing provider in the Partners In Care network, she leveraged its 19-year track record in care coordination and innovation to perfect an outcome-based model of care that focuses on keeping her patients well.   


Working with the Partners In Care team of licensed clinicians and drawing upon her 25-plus years of experience and expertise, she has built an impressive and thriving practice that boasts a waiting list of patients who want to sign up for her personalized medical services.  


Her success has not gone unrecognized. In 2012 she was named to the NJ Monthly magazine “Top Doctors” list, and in 2013, she was named to Castle Connolly’s “America’s Top Doctors” list.  In addition to running her busy practice, she is a sought-after speaker, lecturing throughout New Jersey on the topics of Geriatrics, Age Management and Medical Ethics.  Dr. Schaer is also a Clinical Associate Professor of Medicine at UMDNJ-Robert Wood Johnson and an attending physician at Saint Peter’s University Hospital. 


About Dr. Schaer:


Dr. Schaer was the Chief of the Division of Geriatrics at Saint Peter’s University Hospital for 21 years.  She is a graduate of the University of California at San Diego School of Medicine.  Dr. Schaer completed her residency in Internal Medicine at NYU-Bellevue Medical Center in New York City in 1984 and her fellowship in Geriatric Medicine at George Washington University Medical Center in Washington, DC in 1986. 


For more information about Dr. Schaer and her practice, visit www.signaturehealthsolutions.com


	 


	 



Previous post: Testimonials
Next post: Results






















 © 2013 Partners In Care | 2 Tower Center Blvd., Tower 2, 12th Floor East Brunswick, NJ 08816 | Phone:  (732) 246 0291 | Fax: (732) 745 4798 







Provider Network


























 






Partners In Care






Home
About
Leadership
Clients & Services
Provider Network
News
Contact Us


Delivering Better Health, Better Care at Lower Cost...

      









Provider Network



	PIC Newsletter


	Providers stay informed of the big changes and latest news in healthcare with our provider newsletter. Click here to read the current issue.


	PIC Patient Experience Survey


	In order to assist our member primary care practices, Partners In Care has developed a custom Patient Experience Survey. 


Download the survey here. 


	For more information check out the latest issue of our newsletter.


	Helping Providers Address the Impact of Healthcare Reform… and Thrive


	Partners In Care, Corp. is a physician-owned provider network and healthcare management company established in 1995.  Our provider network is comprised of over 700 medical professionals including primary care physicians, multi-specialty physicians, and clinicians located primarily in Central and Southern New Jersey.  Join Us! 


	Some of the benefits and services that you will enjoy as a Partner In Care provider are as follows:




			BENEFITS


No Annual Dues or Signup Fees:



				Primary Care Physicians, Specialist, Nurse Practitioners and Physician Assistants
			


Additional Revenues



				Shared savings – Medicare and commercial health plan ACOs
			

				Service fees for care collaboration
			

				Increased patient scheduling
			


Enhanced Rates



				Group purchasing power and health plan contracting
			

				Strategic alliances with health plans and other service providers
			


Autonomy



				Your continued independent practice and ownership
			

				Full flexibility for opting out
			

				Ability to maintain existing health plan contracts
			



			SERVICES


Administrative



				Full Affordable Care Act compliance support
			

				Group negotiating and contracting
			

				Complete review of billing and collection processes
			

				Monitoring of health plan adherence to negotiated rates
			


Information Technology



				Health IT and EMR support
			


Clinical and ACO



				Population Health Management
			

				Patient-Centered Medical Home
			

				Care Coordination
			

				Disease Management
			

				Readmission Reduction
			




Click here to hear what one of our long-standing providers has to say about our network.


To sign up, please contact us at (732) 246-0291 or contact@piccorp.com
		 
	


























 © 2013 Partners In Care | 2 Tower Center Blvd., Tower 2, 12th Floor East Brunswick, NJ 08816 | Phone:  (732) 246 0291 | Fax: (732) 745 4798 







About


























 






Partners In Care






Home
About
Leadership
Clients & Services
Provider Network
News
Contact Us


Delivering Better Health, Better Care at Lower Cost...

      









About





Our Story
Our Values
Our Mission



 
 Physician-owned and established in 1995, Partners In Care Corporation is New Jersey’s oldest and most innovative independent provider network and healthcare management company. Founded as a joint venture between Saint Peter's University Hospital and its physician network, United Medical Group (UMG), our mission was to improve the delivery of healthcare in the greater New Brunswick, New Jersey area, and reduce the overall cost of care for patients, the hospital and the physicians.
	

In 2005, we transitioned to full physician ownership. Since then, our provider network has more than quadrupled in size and added primary care physicians, multi-specialty physicians, and other healthcare professionals spanning 14 of the 21 New Jersey counties. Currently, our network includes over 700 providers.


Our healthcare management arm, which focuses on helping public and private sector employers to decrease their healthcare costs, has also greatly increased in size and scope. We work with municipalities, school boards, counties, joint insurance funds, health insurance companies, and self-insured private employers.


We are a privately-held corporation owned by 46 individual shareholders all of whom are primary care and specialty physicians.




		 
	

We are a physician-owned provider network and healthcare management company that firmly believes doctors should be in charge of the treatment plans of their patients. We believe that improving the quality and delivery of patient care is the key to lowering healthcare costs. Our healthcare system is plagued by fragmentation and a lack of coordination, which contributes significantly to rising costs for employers, employees, physicians, patients and health insurance companies.  This reality is exacerbated by the ongoing growth in chronic conditions, such as Diabetes and Heart Disease, and the aging of our population.


Recognizing this reality, we were early pioneers of Population Health Management and Care Coordination, and our programs were the first of their kind in New Jersey. These patient-centered models of care focus on creating physician-directed treatment plans for patients with chronic illnesses, improving coordination among treating physicians and leveraging health IT and patient data to deliver more targeted and effective care. These programs are proven to improve health while lowering costs.


		 
	



		 
	

To deliver better health, better care at a lower cost for the patients we serve 


In a way that:



Is patient centered and physician-led, enhancing provider-patient relationship


Helps providers address the impact of healthcare reforms


Takes advantage of health IT and informatics technologies, tools and best practices


Leverages our growing provider network


Builds on our extensive experience in population health, care coordination, transition in care and disease management support

































 © 2013 Partners In Care | 2 Tower Center Blvd., Tower 2, 12th Floor East Brunswick, NJ 08816 | Phone:  (732) 246 0291 | Fax: (732) 745 4798 






Partners In Care, Corp                                                                                                   - East Brunswick                                    , NJ         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



NJ



East Brunswick



Health and Allied Services, Nec



Health Screening Service



                            Partners In Care, Corp
                                    



 





















P 


Partners In Care, Corp                                                                                                  
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



2 TOWER CENTER BLVD FL 12 EAST BRUNSWICK, NJ 08816
Get Directions



(732) 246-0291
www.piccorp.com                                                                                         





Business Info



 Founded 2017
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $2,949,986.00
 Employee Count 23
 Industries Health Screening Service
 Contacts Kevin O'Brien                                                                                                           







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Partners In Care, Corp                                                                                                   was founded in 2017. Partners In Care, Corp                                                                                                   specializes in Health Screening Service. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







P

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.
















Partners In Care, Corp.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 24, 2017 6:48 PM ET
Healthcare Providers and Services

Company Overview of Partners In Care, Corp.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Partners In Care Corporation, a physician-owned provider network and healthcare management company, provides health and care management services for Medicare fee-for-service beneficiaries in counties, primarily in Central and Southern New Jersey. The company offers care coordination, ER visit and hospital readmission reduction, chronic disease management support, and preventive care services. It serves public and private sector employers, municipalities, school boards, counties, joint insurance funds, and health insurance companies. The company was founded in 1995 and is based in East Brunswick, New Jersey. As of January 23, 2017, Partners In Care, Corp. operates as a subsidiary of Continuum...
Partners In Care Corporation, a physician-owned provider network and healthcare management company, provides health and care management services for Medicare fee-for-service beneficiaries in counties, primarily in Central and Southern New Jersey. The company offers care coordination, ER visit and hospital readmission reduction, chronic disease management support, and preventive care services. It serves public and private sector employers, municipalities, school boards, counties, joint insurance funds, and health insurance companies. The company was founded in 1995 and is based in East Brunswick, New Jersey. As of January 23, 2017, Partners In Care, Corp. operates as a subsidiary of Continuum Health Alliance, LLC.
Detailed Description


2 Tower Center BoulevardTower 212th FloorEast Brunswick, NJ 08816United StatesFounded in 1995



Phone: 732-246-0291

Fax: 732-745-4798

www.piccorp.com







Key Executives for Partners In Care, Corp.




Mr. Richard Leroy Larison


      	Chief Executive Officer
      


Age: 64
        







Ms. Beverly Reinson


      	Chief Operating Officer
      


Age: 63
        







Dr. Mauro Tucci M.D.


      	Chief Medical Officer, Secretary and Director
      








Mrs. Anne Myers


      	Director of Development
      








Dr. Warren A. Sweberg M.D.


      	Treasurer and Director
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @ Home Medical, Inc. United States @home approach, llc United States @Home Care United States 1011 E. Pecan Grove Road, LLC United States 1104 Welsh Road Operations LLC United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target





Merger/Acquisition

			      January 23, 2017
			    
--





Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Partners In Care, Corp., please visit www.piccorp.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close
































        
    About  | Partners HealthCare

    



































        Find A Doctor

        Hospitals

        Partners Patient Gateway

        Careers

        For Employees

        Partners Services Directory

        Newsroom














Partners HealthCare®


Innovation and Leadership
About Partners











For Patients


Find A Doctor
Referral Services
Partners Patient Gateway
What is Partners eCare?
Services Directory
Quality and Safety
Clinical Trials
Wellness 
Partners ACO
Patient Privacy Notice
Billing Information / Financial Assistance







For Medical Professionals


Find A Doctor
Physician Gateway
Inpatient Transfers
Partners Initiatives
Partners Community Physicians Organization 
See Also
Clinical Trials
Physician Referral Service
Continuing Professional Development







Research


Current Research Activities
Industry Collaborations
Education for Researchers
Resources and Information
See Also
Clinical Trials







Medical Education


Graduate Medical Education
Continuing Professional Development
MGH Institute of Health Professions







Serving Our Communities


Health Care Access
Prevention Initiatives
Health Care Workforce
International Services






















Home > About Partners


















About Partners






 Mission & Vision

 Global Mission and Programs




 Members & Affiliations



 Newsroom



 Annual Report

 Annual Reports from Years Past




 Leadership

 Senior Management
 Leaders at our Member Institutions
 Board of Directors




 Philanthropy

 Our Commitment
 Community Programs
 Disease Research
 Global Initiatives




 History & Achievements

 Awards
 Recognition of Partners People
 Chronology
 Partners Celebrates 20 Years
 Partners at 20 Video




 Ethics

 Help Line
 Interactions with Industry




 Supplier / Vendor Information

 Open Letter to Suppliers
 FAQs
 Supplier Guide
 Supplier Diversity Program




 Contact Us

 Contact Us Form
 Partners HealthCare App































































        About Partners HealthCare
Partners HealthCare is a not-for-profit health care system that is committed to patient care, research, teaching, and service to the community locally and globally. Collaboration among our institutions and health care professionals is central to our efforts to advance our mission.
Founded in 1994 by Brigham and Women's Hospital and Massachusetts General Hospital, Partners HealthCare includes community and specialty hospitals, a managed care organization, a physician network, community health centers, home care and other health-related entities. 
Several of our hospitals are teaching affiliates of Harvard Medical School, and Partners is a national leader in biomedical research.
Founding Members

Brigham and Women's Hospital
Massachusetts General Hospital

Members

Brigham and Women's Faulkner Hospital
Cooley Dickinson Hospital
Martha's Vineyard Hospital
McLean Hospital
MGH Institute of Health Professions
Nantucket Cottage Hospital
Neighborhood Health Plan
Newton-Wellesley Hospital
North Shore Medical Center
Partners Community Physicians Organization (PCPO)
Partners HealthCare at Home 
Spaulding Rehabilitation Network
Wentworth-Douglass Hospital

See a complete listing of Partners HealthCare members, locations, programs, and collaborations.



Mission and Vision
The mission of Partners HealthCare begins with providing the highest quality patient care possible – and extends far beyond.






Newsroom
Access Partners' Media Center for the latest news about the organization and stories on many of our latest innovative medical research and patient care programs.







Annual Report
Read Partners' most recent annual report.






Leadership
Find our lists of the senior management team, Board of Directors of Partners HealthCare, as well as the leaders of Partners-affiliated institutions.







Philanthropy and Giving
Partners HealthCare is committed to giving back to the community. Find out more about some of our specific programs and how you can provide support for these initiatives.






History & Achievements
Learn about some of the milestones in Partners HealthCare's history, as well as the latest awards that the organization has won.







Ethics 
Partners HealthCare is committed to conducting its affairs in accordance with the highest ethical and legal standards. Find more about our policies regarding interactions with industry.






Supplier / Vendor Information
Partners HealthCare values the services of our suppliers / vendors and wants to provide the information needed to create ethical and effective working relationships. Find documents and resources for suppliers.







Careers
Find information about jobs with Partners corporate, at our member hospitals, and about career development.






Performance and Quality
Partners HealthCare is committed to delivering the highest quality care to our patients and their families.







Contact Us/ Feedback
Information about how to contact Partners HealthCare.


























Read the Partners HealthCare 2016 Annual Report
Download PDF









Quality and Safety at Partners



























Site Map
Contact Us
Ethics at Partners
Supplier / Vendor Information
RSS Feed
Privacy and Terms of Use





















Partners Healthcare®

            ©Partners HealthCare
        















PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP. Contact Info, Reviews and Feedback | Healthcare Professionals in 08816-1100 | Rehab Reviews Directory



























Rehabs
Mental Health
Buprenorphine
Pain Management
Therapists
Interventionists
Sober Livings

Rehab Reviews
Rehab Reviews Directory
About
Get Help Now

Login
Register










Featured Reviews








 
CLARE Foundation
CLARE has the best treatment available at this price-point. If finances are truly an issue, CLARE is a no brainer.
Read More












 
Newport Academy
Newport Academy is the whole package: individualized clinical expertise, holistic therapies, 12-step support, family healing and a sober learning community.
Read More












 
Cliffside Malibu
Those who need the finest of everything should go to Cliffside Malibu, whose accommodations might have guests finding the Ritz comparatively shabby.
Read More













Mental Health
new jersey
east brunswick
PARTNERS IN C...







      PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP.
      


  (0 Reviews)


Write a Review

      Check Insurance
        Sponsored
 








        2 TOWER CENTER BLVD, 12TH FLOOR, East Brunswick, NJ 08816-1100
      






          7322460291
        






          7328280542
        








        Are you the owner?
Apply to edit this entry














 Info
 Services
 Location






          Contact Information for

        PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP.


PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP. offers health care services in East Brunswick, New Jersey as a/an Case Manager/Care Coordinator professional.  PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP. may offer additional health care support, depending on their availability and your particular needs.
If you have immediate questions, inquiries, or medical needs relating directly to PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP. you may reach out to them at their East Brunswick location in New Jersey at 7322460291. It is best to go through the East Brunswick contact information listed here, rather than approaching PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP. through personal contact information.
To find out if PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP. is a good fit for your health care needs, contact them directly at their office, located near the 08816-1100 area.
Contacting PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP. via telephone, before traveling to their East Brunswick location is generally a choice.


          PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP. Reviews

Rehab Reviews is always looking for more first-hand PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP. reviews from clients, patients, or staff who lived in or visited their sober living environment. If you’re a existing or previous patron of PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP. or are familiar with someone who stayed with them in the East Brunswick region, we would love it if you shared your experiences below, so others seeking care with them can make better, more informed choices.
We understand if you feel compelled to use colorful language (health care is a messy business!) but we can’t allow anyone to threaten bodily injury, write hate speech, and/or include racist words meant to denigrate or offend on the basis of belonging to a particular group, religion, ethnicity, or race.
Try to be kind.
If you can avoid it, we would prefer you not disclose personally identifiable information or data about PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP. or their recent or current clients.
Also, we can’t allow you to beg, borrow, or steal content from someone else’s review of PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP. and publish it here.
Rehab Reviews urges factual reviews from actual interventionist experiences.  We want this page to be useful for future clients or their family members, not jam-packed with promotional or commercial material for PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP..
We withhold the right to remove comments or review that we suspect to be self-promotional.
If you are a representative of PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP., you may contact us to resolve disputed or factual untrue information, but please don’t write promotional content about your own place of business.
If you are a client of PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP. and have information that can help improve the quality of the data or information on this page, you can contact us directly.
If you have ideas to share on how we can improve our directory pages, you may also contact us.


Services Offered



Case Manager/Care Coordinator

















PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP.

              2 TOWER CENTER BLVD
              12TH FLOOR
              East Brunswick, NJ 08816-1100
              (map)
            
7322460291 







Nearby Mental Health







 

EASTER SEALS NEW JERSEY
Read More
  (0 Reviews)










 

DAVID B. KASSOFF
Read More
  (0 Reviews)










 

JENNY LIU
Read More
  (0 Reviews)











 

ANNA STEIF
Read More
  (0 Reviews)










 

STEPHANIE KLEIN STERN
Read More
  (0 Reviews)










 

JONATHAN HUSTON-WONG
Read More
  (0 Reviews)







+ Add Review
Reviews

This listing has not yet been reviewed. Click here to add a review.
        




Featured Listings






 
Evolutions Treatment Center
Read More
  (0 Reviews)










 
Gulf Breeze Recovery
Read More
  (0 Reviews)










 
Pure Recovery California
Read More
  (0 Reviews)










 
Serenity Acres Treatment
Read More
  (0 Reviews)






Free Insurance Benefits Check





AdLegal Stuff - This free insurance benefits check is a service performed by advertising sponsor Service Industries, Inc., part of a network of commonly owned rehabilitation service providers. By inputting your information, you consent to your information being transmitted to Service Industries, Inc., so that one of its representatives may contact you to discuss your insurance benefits and options for obtaining treatment.


Seeking Help For *
- Select -SelfLoved one


Insurance Company Name *



Insurance type *
- Select -MedicareMedi-CalHMOPPOTRICAREOTHERI Don't Have Insurance



First Name *



Last Name *




Your Email *



Best time to call 



Your Phone Number *



Submit Information





Find Addiction Help Near You








Rehabs
Mental Health
Buprenorphine
Pain Management
Therapists


Search Addiction Help














Partners In Care, Corp. - East Brunswick, NJ - Case Manager / Care Coordinator




























Search






Partners In Care, Corp.
Case Manager/Care Coordinator in East Brunswick New Jersey

Home >
New Jersey >
East Brunswick >

Case Manager/Care Coordinator


Profile Overview
Partners In Care, Corp. is listed as a health care organization in East Brunswick, NJ with Case Manager/Care Coordinator listed as their primary specialization.  Their office phone number, address, ratings, provider comparisons, county health rankings, and specializations can be viewed below.





Office Location & Contact Information

Partners In Care, Corp.

2 TOWER CENTER BLVD
12TH FLOOR
EAST BRUNSWICK, NJ 08816-1100






View Ratings Survey
 Get Directions
Phone and Fax:
 732-246-0291
 732-828-0542




Map and Directions
Ratings and Reviews
Additional Info







Driving Directions and Map
Looking for mobile or regular driving directions to the office for Partners In Care, Corp.? View Directions

















Education, Experience, and Specialization(s)

Health Care Field:
Other Service Practitioners

Classification:
Case Manager / Care Coordinator









Client / Patient Ratings for Partners In Care, Corp. 


Are you a patient of Partners In Care, Corp. or familiar with their services? Please consider filling out the ratings survey below to help prospective patients make an informed decision.View Full Ratings Survey
Overall:
How would you rate your overall experience? 


Recommend:
How likely would you be to recommend them to a friend or family member? 


Visit Again:
How likely would you be to schedule another appointment should you be in need of services they offer?

View Full Ratings Survey







Additional Information for Partners In Care, Corp.


Provider Type:
Organization

Definition:
Case Manager/Care Coordinator Definition:

A person who provides case management services and assists an individual in gaining access to needed medical, social, educational, and / or other services.

  The person has the ability to provide an assessment and review of completed plan of care on... 
Full Case Manager/Care Coordinator Definition and Listings



Notes:
A portion of this doctor or health care provider's profile is based on their NPI number (1407994130).
(NPI Final Rule [PDF] from HHS and the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services)




Additional:
Click to Update / Correct / Add Information(such as website, office hours, insurance accepted, appointment scheduling etc.)









Compare Partners In Care, Corp.


The following are a few ways you can compare nearby doctors and health care providers to find the right match for your care needs. You may also be interested in trying a new Search. Thank you for taking the time to visit us!

Case Manager/Care Coordinator Providers in Nearby Cities

East Brunswick
New Brunswick
Highland Park


Piscataway
Matawan
Lincroft













Page Categories:

New JerseyEast Brunswick Case Manager/Care Coordinator







Find Doctors:

NPI Search
Psychologists
Dentists
Family Doctor





About:

Privacy Policy
F.A.Q.
Terms of Use





© 2011 - 2017 eHealthScores is a free doctor and healthcare provider review and rating site designed to help residents of East Brunswick and people throughout the United States find their care match. Patients and providers are encouraged to help others by submitting opening hours, forms of insurance, and appointment details.










East Brunswick New Jersey Case Manager/Care Coordinator Providers




























Search







Case Manager/Care Coordinator
 Providers in East Brunswick





Home



 > 


New Jersey



 > 


East Brunswick



 > 
Case Manager/Care Coordinator









There is one listing for 
Other Service Providers, Case Manager / Care Coordinator located in East Brunswick, New Jersey (Middlesex county). Profile pages include contact information, office numbers, services offered, ratings, and directions. Having trouble finding a listing for the provider you are searching for? We suggest trying our search tool via the search link above.




Provider Name, Office, and Phone


PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP.
2 Tower Center Blvd - 12th Floor - 08816 - East Brunswick, NJ
 - (732) 246-0291



Cities closest to East Brunswick with Case Manager / Care Coordinator Listings:


New Brunswick
Highland Park
Piscataway


Matawan
Lincroft
Howell







Page Categories:
New Jersey East Brunswick




Find Doctors: 
NPI Search
Psychologists
Dentists
Family Doctor




About:
Privacy Policy
F.A.Q.
Terms of Use












Prospect Partners | News: Tender Products, Inc.

















Home 
      | Contact Us | Register | Downloads  
















 
 

Tender Products, Inc.




 

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
October 14, 2008 
 


  
Prospect Partners Invests In Tender Corporation 

Leading Manufacturer of Personal Care Products Will Pursue Acquisitions, New Product Development 

            CHICAGO, Ill.—October 14, 2008: Lower-middle-market private equity firm Prospect Partners, LLC, today announced the formation of Tender Products, Inc. to invest  alongside management led by CEO Jason Cartwright in Tender Corporation of Littleton, New Hampshire. Tender is a leading manufacturer of well-known over-the-counter personal-care and active outdoor products. 

 Founded in 1975, Tender produces a full line of insect bite treatments and repellents, first-aid treatments, sunburn and windburn products, and activity-specific first aid kits and survival gear. The company is perhaps best known for AfterBite®–The Itch Eraser™, which continues to be the best-selling brand in the bite treatment category more than 30 years after its release. Tender produces insect repellents that target specific niches within the broader insect repellent category, including both DEET-based and DEET-free products under the Ben's® and Natrapel® brands, respectively. The company also owns Adventure® Medical Kits, which it acquired in 2003 and which is the premier designer of high-end adventure and survival gear for outdoor enthusiasts. Sold to the food, drug, mass merchandise and outdoor and sporting good retail channels, Tender's products can be found in over 40 countries.

For Prospect Partners, which invests opportunistically in unique small companies in niche consumer, commercial, manufacturing and specialty distribution and service markets, Tender is a true niche innovator with strong leadership, strong brands and many opportunities for growth, said Rick Tuttle, Principal. "We look forward to working with management to continue the company's success, developing new products and pursuing strategic partnerships and select acquisitions." 

Added Tender's CEO Jason Cartwright, "The backing of an experienced partner like Prospect Partners, especially in these challenging economic times, demonstrates the immense confidence it has in our management team's forward-thinking philosophy and in the talent of our employees." 

              In addition to manufacturing, Tender has entered into strategic partnerships that expand its base of products and retail distribution network. The company is the exclusive distributor of Strategic Science Technologies, LLC's HealthiFeet®, a moisturizing cream that helps treat people who suffer from the discomfort associated with neuropathy and poor foot circulation. Tender also will be the exclusive distributor of Z-Medica Corp.'s QuikClot®, which stops traumatic bleeding and is used by the U.S. military and by emergency room professionals throughout the country. 

              With the investment, Mr. Tuttle will serve as Chairman of Tender's Board of Directors. 

              Prospect Partners is the nation's most experienced private equity firm focused on investing in small lower-middle-market companies with revenues under $50 million. Tender Products is the 14th platform investment in Prospect Partners' second fund, Prospect Partners II, L.P., and is the firm's 71st investment since its inception in 1998. 



About Prospect Partners, LLC
              
Prospect Partners, of Chicago, Illinois, is a leading lower-middle-market private equity firm managing $270 million in two funds. A highly experienced, active and committed smaller-company investor, Prospect Partners focuses exclusively on management-led leveraged acquisitions of niche market leaders with revenues typically between $10 million and $50 million. Since its inception in 1998, Prospect Partners has invested nationwide in more than 70 leading companies across a broad range of niche markets, including consumer, commercial, manufacturing, distribution and consumer and business services.



 
  




 © 1998-2017 Prospect Partners. All rights reserved. 
      200 West Madison Street • Suite 2710 • Chicago, IL 60606
    312.782.7400(ph) • 312.782.7410(fx)






Transaction 
              Criteria


Industry 
              Interests










Our Focus 


Our Experience 
              


Our Growth













































Overview


Active Companies


Prior Investments










Latest News


Press Releases










Prospect Team


Advisory Board


Limited Partners











PARTNERS IN CARE CORP - Securities Registration Statement (S-1) BUSINESS





















About EDGAR Online

|
Login












Dashboard
TodayCompany
Industry
Search
Screener
Analytics

  










 















Enter your Email for a Free Trial:








The following is an excerpt from a S-1 SEC Filing, filed by PARTNERS IN CARE CORP on 12/8/2000.





 Next Section












 Previous Section





-- Use Sections To Navigate Through The Document --
FORM S-1
CALCULATION OF REGISTRATION FEE
SUBJECT TO COMPLETION, DATED DECEMBER 8, 2000
PROSPECTUS SUMMARY
The Offering
Summary Financial Data
RISK FACTORS
USE OF PROCEEDS
DIVIDEND POLICY
CAPITALIZATION
DILUTION
SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION
Effects of Inflation and Currency Exchange Rates
BUSINESS
Competition
Employees
Legal Proceedings
MANAGEMENT
NAME AND TITLE
Compensation of Directors
Executive Compensation
COMPENSATION TABLE
Stock Option Plan
PRINCIPAL SHAREHOLDERS
BENEFICIAL OWNERS
CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED PARTY TRANSACTIONS
DESCRIPTION OF CAPITAL STOCK
Transfer Agent and Registrar
SHARES ELIGIBLE FOR FUTURE SALE
LEGAL MATTERS
EXPERTS
WHERE YOU CAN FIND MORE INFORMATION
INDEPENDENT AUDITORS' REPORT
BALANCE SHEET
INCOME STATEMENT
STOCKHOLDERS EQUITY
CASH FLOW
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PART II
Item 13. Other Expenses of Issuance and Distribution
Item 14. Indemnification of Directors and Officers
Item 15. Recent Sales of Unregistered Securities
Item 16. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
Item 17. Undertakings
SIGNATURES
POWER OF ATTORNEY
EXHIBIT INDEX
EXHIBIT 27












PARTNERS IN CARE CORP - S-1 - 20001208 - BUSINESS





BUSINESS




Overview



In its  Vision  2000  strategy,  the  Trustees  of St.  Peter's  University
Hospital, with the support of the community physicians, concluded that we should
reposition  our  business  to  endeavor  to provide  the  community  with higher
quality,  more  cost-effective  health  care.  The next  generation  of advanced
managed  care plans  requires  providers  to be capable of bearing and  managing
greater  levels of  healthcare  risk.  Providers  successful  in this arena must
support:


Aligned incentives that support cost-effectiveness and improved quality;


A strong primary care physician base;


A vertically and horizontally integrated continuum of care;


Agreement upon and reasonable adherence to clinical protocols; and


An information system that supports contract  management, member services,
clinical  judgment  and  management,  inter-clinician communications, and
sales activities.


Recognizing  the need to build a new  health  care  delivery  program,  the
Physician Hospital  Organization  Development Oversight Committee of St. Peter's
University  Hospital  recommended  the  development  of  such  an  organization.
Partners in Care, Corp. was the result of that recommendation. Partners in Care,
Corp. is based on a demanding set of physician  eligibility criteria and greater
expectations  from  hospital  services to ensure  market  leadership in clinical
quality, customer service, and efficiency. The success of this endeavor is based
upon the following assumption:


Greater cost efficiencies can be achieved with equivalent or measurably
better clinical outcomes and member satisfaction through aligned
incentives and clinician managed care.


Partners  in  Care,  Corp.  was  created  to  be  a  for-profit,   multiple
shareholder,  New Jersey corporation,  jointly owned and governed by St. Peter's
University  Hospital and physician members of the United Medical Group, P.C. The
company is structured to ensure equal physician  representation on the Board and
up to 50 percent  ownership  by  physicians.  Physicians  are full  partners  in
planning, implementing and continuously improving corporate performance.


To provide the various  products,  participating  physicians  are organized
under the auspices of a New Jersey Professional Corporation,  the United Medical
Group,  P.C.,  a group  practice  without  walls  and  other  similar  Physician
Organizational structures via the Large Network Partnership concept. The concept
of Large Network  Partnerships  permits currently organized physician groups and
networks (i.e. IPAs) to participate in risk contracts  through Partners in Care,
Corp.  while keeping risk pools  segmented from the United  Medical  Group.  The
existence of this  flexible  approach  allows for the  management  of risk based
contracts,  while preserving  physician autonomy and sustaining small groups and
solo practice models.


A system  like ours needs as many  qualified  primary  care  physicians  as
possible in order to achieve a credible marketplace presence.  Additionally,  to
round  out  the  provider  network,  Partners  in  Care  has  various  strategic
relationships via its risk partners and its third party  administrator to access
a broad network of providers nationwide.


Currently,  PCP  recruitment  is in full  effect  through  both  recruiting
individual  physicians  as  members  of  the  United  Medical  Group,  P.C.  and
negotiation  through ongoing  negotiations with Large Network  Partnerships that
will remain semi-autonomous.



Industry Background



In the mid-1990s,  health care providers in the Greater New Brunswick,  New
Jersey area from  tertiary  centers to primary  care  physicians,  began to face
significant  choices.  Among them were  whether to be an active  organizer  of a
managed  care  delivery  system;  to be a member of an  integrated  managed care
network;  to be an independent vendor of services to a managed care plan or HMO;
to pursue the declining indemnity market; or some combination of the above.


During  this  transition,  prices and  revenues,  especially  for  tertiary
hospitals and highly specialized physicians,  have declined. Fees for procedures
have dropped by twenty-five to seventy-five  percent locally as the region coped
with the full  implementation  of the RBRVS system for federal  programs and the
adoption of RBRVS fee schedule by most  commercial  HMOs and PPOs.  Coupled with
the  growth  of  managed  care  and the  consolidation  of the HMO  marketplace,
especially  the growth of Aetna/U.S.  HealthCare,  the second half of the decade
was very difficult.  The magnitude of this shift demands dramatic  restructuring
of care delivery to eliminate  unnecessary  treatment,  improve efficiency,  and
increase market share. Concurrently,  government, accrediting bodies, employers,
purchasing  groups,  health  plans,  and a  more  informed  public  demand  data
documenting  that lower  prices  and  utilization  levels  are not  compromising
outcomes.  The only  effective  mechanism for provider  groups to cope with this
type of change is to efficiently  organize to both  successfully bear and manage
healthcare risk.


PIC's  business  model  achieves  this  through  successfully  managing the
delivery of care under  system-wide PMPM funding.  This is contrasted with other
Physician/Hospital  Organization  type  structures  whose focus  remained one of
attempting to make up for lost unit prices in a fee for service  marketplace  by
increasing the units of service.  There are too many pressures  being brought to
bear against the increased  units  strategy for it to be effective over the long
term. This harsh lesson has been learned by many of PIC's former competitors.


Within the past 36  months,  HIP  Health  Plan of New  Jersey and  American
Preferred  Provider  Plan both  collapsed,  sending  shock waves through the New
Jersey health services marketplace and our local community. The New Jersey State
Department of Banking and Insurance has announced plans to amend its regulations
to require all New Jersey HMOs to operate under stricter  financial  control and
oversight by regulators. While lines of business other than HMO businesses, such
as PPO insurance plans and PHOs (i.e.,  IDSs and MSOs) are prevalent both in the
state and nationwide, in New Jersey only HMOs are obligated to provide the state
with detailed reports.  Therefore, little information is available regarding the
other markets.  Hence, the focus on the health care industry has been limited to
the HMO component of the business.


HMO enrollment  increased 5.1% between 1995 and 1999. At year-end 1996, the
total  HMO  membership  for the  state of New  Jersey  was  2,142,188.  By 1997,
enrollment  had increased by  approximately  10% to 2,369,325.  During 1998, HMO
enrollment dropped 1.39% but rebounded in 1999 growing .94%.


In the New Jersey HMO market,  there has been a tendency for a small number
of HMOs to continuously strengthen, while several others weaken, fall out of the
market, or become merged into larger plans.  Aetna-U.S.  Healthcare,  possessing
38.4% of the 1999 market  share,  continues to dominate the  marketplace.  Other
market participants  include Horizon Blue (a Blue Cross-Blue Shield subsidiary),
and Physicians  Health Services  (formerly First Option Health Plan) and Oxford,
possessing market shares of 16.99%, 10.3%, and 7.3% respectively. The three HMOs
with the largest  market  share all offer  Medicare  and  Medicaid  plans in New
Jersey.  Oxford offers  commercial  and medicare  only.  Other smaller HMOs also
offer these plans in New Jersey.


A comparison of New Jersey HMO financial  statistics  from year end 1998 to
1999 shows a 2% increase in total health care related revenue to $4,547,274,845.
Medical and hospital  expenses across the New Jersey HMO market  decreased 1% in
1999,  totaling  $3,925,607,929 and yielding a Medical Loss Ratio of 86.33%. The
medical loss ratio increased to 89.82% through the first three quarters of 1999.



MSO Development



As previously  discussed,  we were developed as a response to the desire to
provide the community with higher quality, more cost-effective health care. With
the  support of SPUH and  community  physicians,  we believe  that a health care
delivery  system,  managed by an MSO  (Management  Service  Organization),  will
provide the service needed for the next generation of HMOs and advanced  managed
care plans.


To provide the various  products,  participating  physicians  are organized
under the  auspices of a New Jersey  professional  corporation,  United  Medical
Group,  P.C.,  a group  practice  without  walls.  The  existence  of this large
multi-specialty   group  practice  allows  for  the  management  of  risk  based
contracts,  while preserving small group and solo practice models. A system like
ours requires as many qualified  primary care physicians as possible in order to
achieve a credible marketplace presence. Contrarily, the need for specialists is
based on a network need  methodology  that  evaluates  geographic  accessibility
criteria,  delivery system efficiency,  the number of enrollees and primary care
physicians,  and other  criteria.  The number of physicians  participating  is a
function of the credentialing  criteria set by the Board of Directors of UMG/PIC
and the Network Management Committee.


Currently,  PCP  recruitment  is in  full  effect  through  (i)  recruiting
individual  physicians  as members of the United  Medical  Group,  P.C. and (ii)
negotiating  Large Network  Partnerships that will remain  semi-autonomous.  The
concept of Large Network  Partnerships  permits  currently  organized  physician
groups and networks (i.e.  IPAs) to  participate  in risk contracts  through our
organization  while keeping risk pools  segmented from the United Medical Group.
This  allows us to  acquire  the  greatest  number of  enrollees  and allows for
variable levels of medical management, dependent upon the risk we undertake.



Business Strategy



Our overall strategic goal is to expand and strengthen our current position
in New Jersey's health care delivery market. To achieve this goal, we must:


Aggressively  develop  all  key  infrastructure   components  and
management  expertise under a Healthcare Risk Management/All  Products
Risk contracting strategy over a 60 month period;


Successfully  negotiate and efficiently  manage  population based
"At Risk"  Contracts;


Continue  to  improve  our  core  management   competencies   and
managerial expertise;


Continue to foster existing strategic  partnerships;


Recruit  and  retain  primary  care  physicians   throughout  the
regional market;


Maintain  and improve the clinical  and  operational  information
feedback  cycle  time  which  has been  reduced  in the last year from
months to hours;


Successfully   compete  with  best  in  region   healthcare  risk
management service vendors.


"At  Risk"  contracts  with  compensation  based  on age and  sex  adjusted
capitation rates and/or percentage of premium is currently our dominant business
line. We currently have in place such  contracts with Aetna/USHC and Horizon. We
are  also  designed  to  provide  high-caliber  professional  services,  such as
management  of  risk,  business   development,   medical  management  (including
utilization   management   and   quality   assurance),    information   systems,
credentialing,  provider support services,  network  development and management.
Other services  historically  available for physician practices include practice
management services we offer.  Expansion of the customer base for these services
will be pursued.



Major Business Lines



Our major  business lines are the Health Plan  Management  Services and the
Physician Support Services.


1. Health Plan Management Services.  Our main business is capturing covered
lives and then assisting the providers in managing the delivery of healthcare of
those lives. The main components to this business line include:


a)   Negotiation/Management of "at risk" contracts

b)   Negotiation/Management of Large Network Partnerships

c)   PCP Recruitment

d)   Managed Care Contracting/Administration

e)   Network Management and Provider Relations

f)   Claims and stop loss management

g)   Medical management

h)   Member services


Currently,   we  most   aggressively   pursue  "at  risk"   contracts  with
compensation based on age and sex adjusted capitation rates and/or percentage of
premium. We provide high-caliber  professional  services,  such as management of
risk, business development, information systems, credentialing, provider support
services, network development and management, and medical management,  including
utilization  management  and quality  assurance.  We believe that risk  contract
negotiation  and  management  currently has the ability to generate the greatest
revenue.  The success of this area relies on the ability to negotiate contracts,
capture  covered  lives and assist the providers in managing  those lives.  Risk
contracting involves  contracting with the major health plans,  contracting with
primary  care  physicians,  and  persuading  health plan  enrollees to elect our
primary care physicians.


In 1995,  we entered  into our first  full risk  contract  with  Aetna-U.S.
Healthcare and pursuant to that agreement we are  responsible for delivering and
medically  managing  the  complete  medical  loss ratio,  with the  exception of
pharmacy,  mental  health,  and  services  inconsistent  with  the  Ethical  and
Religious  Directives for Catholic  Healthcare  Facilities.  In August 1998, the
Medicare risk  component  was  implemented  with AUSHC.  The AUSHC risk contract
presently  covers  commercial  and  Medicare  lives with an option to  integrate
Medicaid  lives into the risk  program.  At  year-end  1999,  there were  22,900
at-risk lives, including 1,694 Medicare members.


During 2000, PIC and Horizon completed an arrangement whereby we will share
in reduction in medical costs from an  established  budget.  Effective July 1st,
this is the first step in building a long-term  full risk  sharing  relationship
that has been  anticipated  for some time.  We will once again be the manager of
the risk  related  clinical  and  financial  information,  while our HMO partner
retains the  responsibility  for utilization  management and claims  processing.
However, our role will evolve to become increasingly  involved in all aspects of
medical management.  The agreement encompasses commercial HMO/POS, Medicare HMO,
and should lead into risk sharing for  Horizon's  self-insured  population.  The
commercial  population  should grow from 4,000 to 7,000 by the first  quarter of
2001, while Medicare should remain around the 400 member level.


The key  management  areas for risk  contracting  are also essential in the
delivery of the Health Plan division's second source of business,  administering
the ERISA employee health benefits plan for SPUH, d.b.a. Partners in Care Health
Plan.  Direct   contracting  with  SPUH,   regarding  this  plan  is  through  a
self-insured,  ERISA  health plan which we manage.  This  structure is necessary
because we are not currently  licensed as either a health care insurance company
or an HMO within the State of New Jersey.



Physician Support Services



The current Delivery System division has been evaluated and restructured to
focus on Physician Support Services. As part of our restructuring, we eliminated
all  unprofitable or  non-complimentary  lines of business.  The Delivery System
division will thus be transitioned into the physicians support services area.


The main components and sub-business lines include the following:


a)  Provider   connectivity   and  e-health

-  Electronic billing  solution for HCFA 1500s

-  Ease the  interface with managed care organizations

-  Reduce the paperwork burden on physician office staffs

-  Improve the clinical information flow among PIC providers

b)  Referral management

c)  Information systems and services

d)  Business office

e)  Site operations management

f)  General, administrative and management  services

g)  Operational assessments, evaluations  and  general counseling

h)  Advocacy (Dispute resolution, issues management, Health Plan
Communications, etc.)


We cultivate four (4) core competencies:


1. Business Development and Contracting.  Our success relies on our ability
to negotiate  contracts and capture covered lives. Each covered life converts to
about a $1,500 annual revenue stream.


For Health Plan Risk Contracting,  we must perform two functions to acquire
enrollees.  First, we must contract with the major health plans. Second, we must
contract with primary care  physicians  who hold contracts with the Health Plan.
The  first  is a  contracting  and  personal  sales  function  of our  executive
officers.  The second is a large,  coordinated effort between PIC and the health
plans.


For  the  ERISA  line  of  business,  we may  contract  directly  with  the
self-insured  employee  benefit plan or we may partner with our Health Plan risk
partners (HMO's) to convert existing  membership to at-risk status. The first is
a direct,  Administrative  Services  Only (ASO)  Health  Plan sales  function in
partnership via contracted Third Party  Administrators.  The second is a direct,
ASO Health Plan sales function via our Health Plan risk partners. Both areas are
fundamental  core  competencies of ours that will be developed by harnessing the
untapped   expertise   within  our   organization  and  expanding  our  business
acquisition strategy.


The success of our  marketing  will  require an  educational  component  to
increase  awareness of the advantages of a healthcare risk  management  company,
such as Partners in Care and, specifically, of risk contracting. More aggressive
marketing  and services must be developed.  Additional  market  research must be
undertaken at regular intervals to obtain the constant feedback of our customers

(Primary Care Physicians,  Hospitals,  Specialists,  Health Plans and Enrollees)

and partner's needs and  perceptions.  Currently one of the greatest  challenges
facing us in this area is the  saturation  of the  existing  PCP base due to the
influx of the HIP population into AUSHC.


2. Network Management and Physician Support Services(PS 2). We must be able
to provide  services to providers  which are  perceived as value added  (revenue
improvement, expense reduction, quality of care enhancement) in order to balance
our financial  needs with market  attractiveness  to physicians.  In conjunction
with our  Strategic  Partners,  we are  currently  developing  an array of these
services  which  will  be  supported  through  a  fortified  Network  Management
department.


3. Information  Management,  Reporting and Transfer. The ability to gather,
store,   analyze,   report,   and  disseminate   information   (e.g.   physician
connectivity) in a timely manner regardless of the geographical  distribution of
providers is central to the success of a  healthcare  risk  management  company.
Through our initiatives and  management's  expertise in converting raw data into
management  information,  we are uniquely  qualified to succeed.  HIPPA  (Health
Insurance  Portability and Accountability Act) regulations will continue to make
this area ever more  challenging but through an array of Strategic  Partnerships
and creative e-health strategies,  we are positioning  ourselves to maintain our
unique position in the region with respect to information management. HIPPA is a
federal mandate  requiring the health industry to implement a series of data and
transaction   standards   in  an  effort  to   increase   the   protection   and
confidentiality of individually identifiable health information.


4. Medical  Management.  The Medical Management plan involves the following
existing lines of medical business:


-    Health Plan Risk Partners

-    Third Party Administrator Business Partners


The original  template for Medical  Management is based on the relationship
with  Health  Plans.   Medical  Management  in  this  relationship  is  done  in
conjunction with Health Plan and data is shared with us. The Health Plan and our
Medical  Directors  interact with attending  physicians to ensure  timeliness of
service, quality issues, and effective medical management. Our Medical Directors
will  discuss  medical  cases and offer  alternatives  to care to the  attending
physicians.  Programs  designed  and  offered by the Health  Plan and the Health
Plan's case management and discharge planning departments augment this process.


Medical Management with Third Party  Administrator  Business Partners is an
expanded role. Our team obtains  utilization and discharge planning  information
directly.  Our Medical  Director and Medical  Management team then interact with
the attending physicians as above regarding case management, discharge planning,
quality assessment and utilization of inpatient and outpatient services.


Programmatically,  Medical Management is entering a substantial but focused
expansion  phase.   Current  projects  underway  include  initiatives  aimed  at
enhancing the delivery of services immediately following the acute care hospital
phase of care. These services, whether sub acute care,  rehabilitation,  skilled
nursing,  or home care are frequently  found to be extremely  fragmented and not
well coordinated  with the acute care facility.  In many cases it is the family,
not the clinical community, who must serve as the care manager, coordinating and
reaching out to the various  levels of care. We are  committed to  defragmenting
this  service  delivery  and in the  process  substantial  and  measurable  cost
reductions are anticipated.


A second area of focus will be the delivery of care in the  continuum  from
emergency services to acute hospitalization.  Our research indicates substantial
improvement  potential  from  both  a  quality  care  and  cost  perspective  in
addressing and extending the services  available in the Emergency  Department of
participating  facilities.  Ranging from observation to short term treatment, it
is felt that  there  are ample  opportunities  for the  improvement  of the care
delivery process in this venue.



Credentialing Services



To date we have recruited 276 (122 UMG Specialists,  and 104 UMG PCP's). We
have  also  credentialed  28 PCP's  in Large  Network  Partnership  2054  Family
Practice  Center  Ferren  Mall and 22 PCP's in Large Network  Partnership  CJPN)
primary care and specialist physicians in our core network. These physicians are
located  at  over  153  locations  throughout  Middlesex,  Somerset,  Hunterdon,
Monmouth and Mercer  counties,  making the United Medical  Group,  PC one of the
largest groups in the state of New Jersey.


The initial physician participation was based on the following criteria:


- Board certification or board eligibility (to be certified within 4 years)

- Cost per discharge

- Length of stay

- Quality and utilization outcome indicators

- Malpractice History


All criteria met or exceeded National Committee on Quality Assurance (NCQA)
standards in order to make us meet the market  standard and be a more  desirable
candidate for delegated credentialing in risk contracting.


The  Network  Development  focus for 2000 is on Large  Network  Partnership
development  in addition to primary care  physician  recruitment.  Large Network
Partnerships  are large  physician  groups that  participate  in our  contracts.
Initially,   twenty-two  PCPs  have  been  targeted  for  recruitment  into  our
organization  via these two  strategies.  Ultimately,  an additional 250 PCPs in
Central New Jersey are necessary to meet strategic targets.



Information Management and Performance Reporting



Although information management and performance reporting capabilities have
been a function of our operations  since inception,  our current  reorganization
will include a substantial expansion of resources in this area by increasing the
number and  capabilities of existing staff,  focusing on products by simplifying
our operating system environment,  and expanding corporate use and functionality
of the internet for research, data storage, dissemination, and e-commerce.



Marketing



We have not traditionally  had a formal marketing and sales strategy.  As a
result,  we have dedicated only minimum levels of management focus and resources
to  marketing  and sales.  Our health  plan  management  services  division  has
approached  the overall  health care market as a  "wholesaler"  through its risk
agreement with AUSHC. More direct efforts have been employed for the Partners In
Care Health Plan which services the self-insured employee population of SPUH. In
early second  quarter 1999, a concentrated  sales  initiative was launched which
utilized  a newly  developed  provider  relations  staff and  senior  management
resources.


Developing  and  implementing  a formal  marketing  strategy plan is a high
priority  for us as we fortify  and broaden  our  product  portfolio  for direct
"retail"  distribution to specific market groups.  We are currently  focusing on
identifying  specific target markets and market  segments,  designing  marketing
plans  to  achieve  acceptable   penetration  levels  within  each  market,  and
developing  a  communications  and  promotional   strategy  to  establish  brand
awareness  (image)  across  all market  segments.  We intend to  facilitate  the
transition  from  a  "wholesale"  to  a  "retail"  product/service  distribution
approach and maximize opportunities for cross-divisional selling.



Service Area Demographic Overview




Middlesex County



Middlesex  County's  population  continues  to  climb  steadily.  In  1990,
Middlesex County's population was 671,811. In the past ten years, the population
has grown 9%, and is projected to grow another 10% by 2010.  The  penetration of
HMOs in Middlesex  County is 27%. This is slightly  lower than the average state
HMO penetration of 29%.


Within the county there are six acute care hospitals, including Robert Wood
Johnson  University   Hospital  and  St.  Peter's  University  Hospital  in  New
Brunswick,  JFK Medical  Center in Edison,  Raritan  Bay  Medical  Center in Old
Bridge and Perth Amboy,  and the  Memorial  Medical  Center at South Amboy.  JFK
Medical   Center  also  operates  the  Johnson   Rehabilitation   Institute,   a
comprehensive  rehabilitation  facility  in Edison,  and the  county  government
operates Roosevelt Hospital, a chronic and long-term care hospital in Metuchen.



Somerset County



In 1990,  Somerset County's  population was 240,245.  In the past ten years
the  population  has grown 22% and is projected to grow another 15% by 2010. HMO
penetration  of Somerset  County's  population is 25%,  slightly  lower than the
state average of 29%.


Somerset Medical Center is the sole acute care hospital in the county.  Two
specialized  hospitals are also located within the county:  Carrier  Foundation,
Belle Mead, a mental health  facility,  and the Veterans Affairs Medical Center,
Lyons, a chronic and long-term care hospital for veterans.



Hunterdon County



In 1990,  Hunterdon County's  population was 107,802. In the past ten years
the  population has grown 18%, and is projected to grow another 11% by 2010. HMO
penetration  of Hunterdon  County's  population is 25%,  slightly lower than the
state average of 29%.






Burlington County



In 1990,  Burlington County's population was 395,066. In the past ten years
the  population  has grown 9%, and is projected to grow another 8% by 2010.  HMO
penetration of Burlington  County's  population is 32%, slightly higher than the
state average of 29%.



Monmouth County



In 1990,  Monmouth County's  population was 553,093.  In the past ten years
the  population  has grown 11%, and is projected to grow another 7% by 2010. HMO
penetration  of Monmouth  County's  population is 27%,  slightly  lower than the
state average of 29%.



Morris County



In 1990, Morris County's  population was 421,361. In the past ten years the
population  has grown 10%,  and is  projected  to grow  another 7% by 2010.  HMO
penetration of Morris County's  population is 23%, slightly lower than the state
average of 29%.



Ocean County



In 1990, Ocean County's  population was 433,203.  In the past ten years the
population  has grown 14%,  and is  projected  to grow  another 9% by 2010.  HMO
penetration of Ocean County's  population is 26%,  slightly lower than the state
average of 29%.



Union County



In 1990, Union County's  population was 493,819.  In the past ten years the
population  has grown only 1%, and is projected to remain flat through 2010. HMO
penetration of Union County's  population is 26%,  slightly lower than the state
average of 29%.





Competition



In 1998  MedPartners and PhyCor presented some of our most serious national
competition.  In  first  quarter  1999,  MedPartners,  Inc.,  an  Alabama  based
corporation,  discontinued  operations of its practice  management  and contract
services.  Included in their physician clients was Summit Medical Group, a local
physician  network  comprising  approximately 85 physicians.  Termination of the
relationship  between Summit Medical Group and MedPartners  marked the return of
Summit Medical  Group,  P.A. to one of the largest  independent  multi-specialty
groups in the region and must now be recognized as our competitor.


PhyCor, a Tennessee based IDS/MSO, is a local competitor.  PhyCor currently
operates clinics with physicians in 29 states and recently joined with Physician
Partners  Company,  Inc.,  L.C.C. to create and operate a regional  managed care
contracting network, to include independent practice  associations (IPAs) in New
York City, northern New Jersey, southern Connecticut, and Long Island. PhyCor is
larger than we are and has extensive experience throughout the country assisting
physicians in organizing networks and in managing risk contracts.  One advantage
which we  believe we have over  PhyCor is that we are  already  established  and
operating in the local community.



Intellectual Property, Trademarks and Proprietary Rights



We have filed both federal and state service mark applications for the mark
"Partners  In Care".  The service mark has been  registered  in the State of New
Jersey. The federal  application has been rejected and we are currently amending
the  application  to  submit  it for  reconsideration.  We do not own any  other
intellectual property, trademarks, servicemarks or proprietary rights.



Facilities



We lease approximately  9,100 square feet of office space in Somerset,  New
Jersey, for our corporate headquarters.  Activities at our Somerset headquarters
include  administration,  sales,  product  development  and  support.  The lease
provides  for base rent of  approximately  $13,000 per month and expires on June
30, 2004. We believe that our current  facilities are adequate to meet our needs
for the foreseeable future.






Employees



As of June  30,  2000,  we had  approximately  60  full-time  employees,  7
full-time temporary employees and 2 part-time  employees.  We believe our future
success will depend,  in part, on continued ability to attract and retain highly
qualified  personnel in a competitive market for sales and marketing  personnel.
None  of our  employees  are  represented  by a  labor  union  or  subject  to a
collective  bargaining  agreement.  We believe that our relations with employees
are good.






Legal Proceedings



There are currently no claims or actions pending against us.












BROKERAGE PARTNERS


































© 1995-2017
EDGAR Online, Inc.
All rights reserved  NASDAQ:
EDGR 
Solutions for Corporations  
Terms of Use  
Privacy Statement














PARTNERS IN CARE CORP - Securities Registration Statement (S-1/A) EXHIBIT 10





















About EDGAR Online

|
Login












Dashboard
TodayCompany
Industry
Search
Screener
Analytics

  










 















Enter your Email for a Free Trial:








The following is an excerpt from a S-1/A SEC Filing, filed by PARTNERS IN CARE CORP on 10/19/2001.





 Next Section












 Previous Section





-- Use Sections To Navigate Through The Document --
FORM S-1/A
CALCULATION OF REGISTRATION FEE
SUBJECT TO COMPLETION, DATED OCTOBER 19, 2001
TABLE OF CONTENTS
PROSPECTUS SUMMARY
THE OFFERING
Summary Financial Data
RISK FACTORS
USE OF PROCEEDS
PLAN OF DISTRIBUTION
SELLING SHAREHOLDERS
DIVIDEND POLICY
CAPITALIZATION
DILUTION
SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITIONAND
Effects of Inflation and Currency Exchange Rates
Liquidity and Capital Resources
BUSINESS
Medical Management
Competition
Employees
Legal Proceedings
NAME AND TITLE
NAME AND TITLE
Compensation of Directors
Executive Compensation
COMPENSATION TABLE
Stock Option Plan
Compensation Committee Interlocks and Insider Participation
PRINCIPAL SHAREHOLDERS
BENEFICIAL OWNERS
CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED PARTY TRANSACTIONS
DESCRIPTION OF CAPITAL STOCK
Transfer Agent and Registrar
SHARES ELIGIBLE FOR FUTURE SALE
LEGAL MATTERS
EXPERTS
WHERE YOU CAN FIND MORE INFORMATION
INDEPENDENT AUDITORS' REPORT
BALANCE SHEET
INCOME STATEMENT
STOCKHOLDERS EQUITY
CASH FLOW
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PART II
Item 13. Other Expenses of Issuance and Distribution
Item 14. Indemnification of Directors and Officers
Item 15. Recent Sales of Unregistered Securities
Item 16. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
Item 17. Undertakings
SIGNATURES
EXHIBIT INDEX
EXHIBIT 3
BYLAWS
EXHIBIT 5
EXHIBIT 10
EXHIBIT 10
EXHIBIT 23
Consent of Independent Certified Public Accountants












PARTNERS IN CARE CORP - S-1/A - 20011019 - EXHIBIT_10





Exhibit 10.3




AMENDMENT DATED JULY 6, 1999

TO HEALTH CARE SERVICES AGREEMENT

BETWEEN PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP. ("PIC")

AND AETNA U.S. HEALTHCARE




PROVIDER #:       540549

EFFECTIVE DATE:   JULY 1, 1998



This amendment amends Paragraphs 17 and 19 and Attachment B of the Health Care
Services Agreement between Partners In Care, Corp. and Aetna U.S. Healthcare
executed on July 11 and 14, 1995 as follows:


For purposes of this Agreement, the following definition shall apply:


"Existing Group Practice" - a medical practice in which at least one (1)
physician was a PIC/Aetna USHC Provider on or before July 1, 1999.


"Aetna USHC REF" - the standard fee schedule in effect for any Aetna or Aetna
USHC plan or product.


"PIC Enhanced Fees" - the higher of 120% of the then current HCFA RBRVS rates or
120% of the Aetna USHC REF as defined above. In no case shall the PIC Enhanced
Fees be less than 120% of what the provider would have otherwise received had
the PIC Enhanced Fee formula not been developed.


A. The following language shall be added to paragraph 17 - Non-HMO Program
Participation:


Partners In Care physicians set forth on the attached Schedules A and A-1
and any PIC physician joining an existing PIC/Aetna USHC group practice
shall continue to have all rights and responsibilities set forth in the
Aetna USHC Specialist Physician Agreement and Primary Care Physician
Agreements as amended to and including the date of this amendment. In the
event a PIC physician on the attached list or any PIC physician joining an
existing PIC/Aetna USHC group practice chooses to participate in all
Aetna-USHC products, said provider shall be compensated at the PIC Enhanced
Fees for all products. Partners In Care Specialist and Primary Care
Physicians not set forth on the attached list and not joining an Existing
Group Practice (hereinafter "New PIC Physicians") shall participate in all
commercial or governmental plans or programs as maybe requested by Aetna
USHC. Aetna USHC shall pay such New PIC Physicians at the then current
Aetna USHC REF or Primary Care capitation model as applicable.


B. Paragraph 19 of the Health Care Services Agreement (HCSA) is amended by the
addition of the following:


Notwithstanding the above, Provider may obtain a license and operate a
Health Maintenance Organization providing health plans for governmentally
sponsored health programs,





including but not limited to Medicare. Nothing herein shall be interpreted
so as to prohibit provider from providing ASO and health plan management
services to St. Peter's University Hospital and its affiliates.


C. Attachment B to the HCSA COMPENSATION is amended with the addition of the
following sentence.


Partners In Care shall not be required to participate in any Medicaid
percentage of premium arrangement until such time as PIC and Aetna USHC
mutually agree that PIC is ready to manage the same.


D. Attachment B to the HCSA COMPENSATION is also amended by the addition of the
following which replaces the third paragraph of the Compensation section of said
Attachment B:


The above notwithstanding, Partners In Care's percentage of premium shall
never be less than HMO's Medical Loss Ratio for New Jersey, as filed with
the State of New Jersey Department of Insurance, over the identical time
span. For these purposes and for purposes of reconciliation, HMO's Medical
Loss Ratio shall be calculated independently for Commercial, Medicare, and
Medicaid products by utilizing Table 13GT: The Premiums, Enrollment, and
Utilization Table of the Annual Statement of Aetna U. S. Healthcare, Inc.
HMO's Medical Loss Ratio shall be the result of dividing Line 18 (Amount
Incurred for Provision of Healthcare Services) by Line 14 (Premiums
Earned) and shall be rounded to the nearest 1/100th of a percent (i.e.,
75.001% rounded to 75.00%). The following Columns will be used for the
specific products respectively:



PRODUCT      COLUMN




Commercial - Column 2 (Total Group)
Medicare   - Column 7 (Medicare Risk)
Medicaid   - Column 9 (Medicaid).


A copy of Table 13GT: The Premiums, Enrollment, and Utilization Table of
the 1998 Annual Statement of the Aetna U.S. Healthcare Inc., is attached to
this Amendment to clarify the description above. In the event that the
State filing procedures change so that Table 13GT or the associated Lines
and Columns referenced herein are no longer applicable or no longer in use,
PIC and AUSHC shall use the filings, tables lines or columns which come
closest to reflecting the intent of and the results obtained by using the
data referenced herein above.


E. This paragraph replaces Section 12 of the Health Care Services Agreement
between Partners In Care, Corp. and Aetna U.S. Healthcare executed on July 11
and 14, 1995 ("The HCSA").


"12. Term of Agreement. This agreement shall be effective for five

(5) years from July 1, 1998. Neither party may terminate this
Agreement for convenience during the initial term. Thereafter,
this agreement shall be renewed for an additional five (5) year
period unless terminated by either party at its sole discretion
and option by





a written notice thereof mailed to the other party by certified
or registered mail at least one-hundred eighty (180) days prior
to January 1, 2003. On termination, the rights of each party
shall terminate. However, Provider may be required by HMO to
complete treatment of persons then being treated and HMO shall
reimburse Provider for any such treatment pursuant to Paragraph 3
of the Agreement. This Agreement may be terminated for cause at
any time by either party if the other has breached any material
term or condition of this Agreement and the breach has not been
cured within 30 days after written notice of intent to terminate
is received."


F. To improve the accuracy of the Quarterly Reconciliation process, HMO agrees
to provide interim quarterly estimates of the product specific Medical Loss
Ratios as calculated above.


G. PIC represents that it has Power of Attorney on behalf of PIC Physicians
listed on Schedules A and A-1 to execute this Amendment.


H. Except as modified herein and through any amendments to the date hereof, the
terms of the Health Care Services Agreement, Specialist Physician Agreement and
Primary Care Physician Agreement executed on July 11 and 14, 1995 remain in full
force and effect.


I. This amendment shall not become effective unless and until the Specialist
Physician Agreement Amendment and the Primary Care Physician Agreement
Amendment, dated July 6, 1999, are fully executed.


IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Amendment.





AETNA U.S. HEALTHCARE




By:       [Signature Illegible]



Printed:









Title:   Vice President
         -------------------------------------
Date:                7-27-85
         -------------------------------------








PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP., on behalf of the corporation and Physicians set forth
on attached Schedules A and A-1.



By:      Dennis Wilson

Printed: Dennis Wilson











Title:   President and Chief Executive Officer
         -------------------------------------
Date:    July 12, 1999
         -------------------------------------













Schedule A
Partners In Care
Primary Care Providers and Offices






                     Primary Care Providers
                     ----------------------
Huda Alsheikh                                   Manju Misra
Beth Balinski                                   Nasreen Naqui
Cathleen Ballance                               John Nevins
Cynthia Barabas                                 Bipinchandra Patel
William Bernstein                               Marylin Pierre-Louis
Virginia Borromeo                               Hema Pillai*
Lorenzo Borromeo                                Vijaya Radhakrishna
Lina Cambria                                    Sharon Ryan
Abhijit Chatterjee *                            Peter Salerno
Deborah Chen                                    Harold Sand
Richard Cohen                                   Teresa Schaer
Paul Curtis                                     Catherine Schiano
Hema Dave                                       Thomas Schwartzer
Louis Diemer                                    Michael Segarra
Elaine Donoghue                                 Sabra Shulman
Peter C. Freis                                  Elisabeth Simon
Subrahmanyam Ganti                              Richard Snepar
Marvin Goldman                                  Jay Sultan
Alla Gordina                                    Warren Sweberg
Mehnaz Haq                                      Michelle Tomlinson
Julio Hip-Flores                                Terezia Toth
Amy Jaroslow                                    Mauro Tucci
Otto Jorgensen                                  Mercedita Urgino
Marsha Kallich                                  Lakshmi Vadapalli
Melvin Katz                                     Jose Vigario*
Irving Kaufman                                  Rajesh Wadhwa*
Nayan Kothari                                   Howard Wiener
Ronald Lau                                      Ramalakshmi Yerramilli














                      Primary Care Offices
                      --------------------
Alla Gordina, MD                                Medical Associates of New Brunswick
Amwell Pediatrics, PC                           Mehnaz A. Haq, MD
Central Jersey Family Physicians, PA            Nasreen Naqui, MD
Comprehensive Care Group                        New Brunswick Pediatric Group, PA
East Brunswick Pediatric Associates, PA         North Brunswick Pediatrics
Edison Emergi-Med                               Old Bridge Family Practice
Highland Park Medical Associates                Paul Curtis, MD
Huda Y. Alsheikh, MD                            Peter Freis, MD, PA
Immedi-Care                                     Ronald Lau, MD
Irving Kaufman, MD                              S. Ganti, MD, PA
Lakshmi Vadapalli, MD                           St. Peter's Ambulatory Care Group
Livingston Pediatrics                           Terezia Toth, MD
Lorenzo Borromeo, MD                            Vijay Radhakrishna, MD
Medical Associates of Central Jersey            Virginia Borromeo, MD








* indicates Partners in Care physician currently applying to Aetna - U.S.

Healthcare







Schedule A-1
Partners In Care
Specialty Care Providers






Shalom Abboudi                                  Sataya Kastuar
David Ahmadi                                    Michael Kicenuik
Richard Akawie                                  Kyu-Soo Kim
Joseph Alvaro                                   Robert Klein
Jeffrey Bechler                                 Kenneth Klein
Roger Behar                                     Fredric Kleinbart
Daniel Beim                                     Stephen Konigsberg
Fay Bennett-Phillips                            David Koota
Jay Blum                                        Joseph Leddy
Charles Brandwein                               Steven Lenger
H.Stephen Brody                                 David Lessing
Amar Bukhari                                    Stuart Levine
Mark Butler                                     Robert Levitt
Robert Caccavale                                Richard Maggio
Andrew Camerota                                 Thomas Magliaro
Anthony Catanese                                Marc Malberg
William Chen                                    Arie Maman
Seung Chun Cho                                  Eric Manning
Sheela Choubey                                  Andrew Martin
Stephen Cook                                    Susan McManus
Gregory Corsan                                  Matthew Menken
Andrew Covit                                    Ian Jeffrey Molk
Michael Coyle                                   Meena Murthy
Richard Cytryn                                  Mehdi Naqui
Steven Deak                                     Naryanan Natarajan
Glenn Dubov                                     Kevin Nini
Bruce Edelman                                   Primabel Obias
Felix Evangelista                               Anthony Passannante Jr.
Mark Feierstein                                 Anthony Passannante, Sr.
Robert Fein                                     Bradley Phillips
Mitchell Ferges                                 Lawrence Pickover
Charles Franco                                  Allan Plumser
Steven Fried                                    Marcus Porcelli
Patrick Gainey                                  Niranjan Rao
Charles Gatt                                    David Richards
Alvin Glasgold                                  Gregory Rihacek
Mark Glasgold                                   Jeffrey Rosenbaum
Robert Glass                                    Martin Rosenstein
Michael Goldberg                                Jack Rubin
Steven Goldberg                                 Anthony Scardella
Michael Goldrich*                               Milton Schwartz
Joel Goldsmith                                  John Scully
Stephen Gordon                                  Tasneem Shamim
Renee Gross                                     Larry Shindelman
David Harwood                                   Michael Silverstein
Charles Highstein                               Dinesh Singal
Jay Horowitz                                    Francine Sinofsky
Timothy Hosea                                   Michael Solomon
Zofia Hrymoc                                    Eva Stahl
Pasqualino Ioffreda                             Alfred Tria
Richard Ioffreda                                Michael Weingarten
Narayanan Jeganathan                            Hen-Vai Wu
Chandrakala Kamath                              Joseph Zullo
Nuzhat Karim








* indicates Partners in Care physician currently applying to Aetna - U.S.

Healthcare





0000-95287-1998-430-99-1-04




Annual Statement for the      of the Aetna U.S. Healthcare Inc. (a New Jersey
Corporation)



PREMIUMS, ENROLLMENT AND UTILIZATION TABLE

REPORT FOR:




1. CORPORATION...Aetna U.S. Healthcare Inc. (a New Jersey corporation)

2. DIVISION...Fairfield, NJ



BUSINESS IN THE STATE OF GRAND TOTAL DURING THE YEAR




NAIC Group Code...0001                                 NAIC Company Code...95287







--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                                                         Group
                                                               -----------------------------------------------------------
                                                       1              2              3           4                5
                                                     Grand          Total       Experience       Class        Community
                                                     Total          Group      Rated Groups  Rated Groups    Rated Groups
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Total Members at end of:
  1. Prior year ..............................       779,332          646,459        0           0               646,459
  2. First quarter ...........................       839,089          696,502        0           0               696,502
  3. Second quarter ..........................       844,920          696,901        0           0               696,901
  4. Third quarter ...........................       750,228          597,001        0           0               597,001
  5. Current year ............................       759,744          600,981        0           0               600,981
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
  6. Current Year Member Months ..............     9,544,354        7,750,577        0           0             7,750,577
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Total Member Ambulatory Encounters for Year:
  7. Physician ...............................     6,833,255        4,907,095        0           0             4,907,095
  8. Non-physician ...........................             0                0        0           0                     0
  9. Totals ..................................     6,833,255        4,907,095        0           0             4,907,095
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 10. Hospital Patient Days Incurred ..........       326,660          160,892        0           0               160,892
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 11. Premiums collected ...................... 1,555,583,468    1,027,572,705        0           0         1,027,572,705
 12. Premiums receivable:
     a. Year-end - current ...................    73,386,398       56,384,636        0           0            56,384,636
     b. Year-end - prior .....................    56,000,095       54,356,865        0           0            54,356,865
 13. Unearned or advanced premiums:
     a. Year-end - current ...................    44,807,276        7,922,257        0           0             7,922,257
     b. Year-end - prior .....................    42,132,590       13,140,801        0           0            13,140,801
 14. Premiums Earned ......................... 1,570,295,085    1,034,819,020        0           0         1,034,819,020
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 15. Amount paid for provision of health
     care services ........................... 1,280,782,318      800,510,881        0           0           800,510,881
 16. Amount reported unpaid for provision
     of health care services:
     a. Year-end - current....................    46,617,644       39,776,389        0           0            39,776,389
     b. Year-end - prior .....................   228,440,219      151,530,411        0           0           151,530,411
 17. Amount estimated incurred but unreported
     for provision of health care services:
     a. Year-end - current ...................   213,852,181      117,208,317        0           0           117,208,317
     b. Year-end - prior .....................     5,225,894        4,165,182        0           0             4,165,182
 18. Amount incurred for provision of health
     care services ........................... 1,307,586,030      801,799,994        0           0           801,799,994
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                              Medicare
                                             --------------------------------------
                                                  6              7           8            9            10          11
                                               Medicare       Medicare    Medicare
                                             for Enrollees      Risk        Cost         Medicaid   Individual   Other
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Total Members at end of:
  1. Prior year .............................     XXX            61,937         0         61,982       8,954         0
  2. First quarter ..........................     XXX            72,540         0         60,256       9,791         0
  3. Second quarter .........................     XXX            75,004         0         62,895      10,120         0
  4. Third quarter ..........................     XXX            77,532         0         65,108      10,587         0
  5. Current year ...........................     XXX            78,857         0         68,403      11,503         0
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
  6. Current Year Member Months .............     XXX           900,971         0        769,292     123,514         0
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Total Member Ambulatory Encounters for Year:
  7. Physician ..............................     XXX         1,456,639         0        392,002      77,519         0
  8. Non-physician ..........................     XXX                 0         0              0           0         0
  9. Totals .................................     XXX         1,456,639         0        392,002      77,519         0
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 10. Hospital Patient Days Incurred .........     XXX           130,304         0         35,464           0         0
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 11. Premiums collected .....................          0    429,403,744         0     98,607,019           0         0
 12. Premiums receivable:
     a. Year-end - current ..................          0      3,599,997         0     13,401,765           0         0
     b. Year-end - prior ....................          0        502,809         0      1,140,421           0         0
 13. Unearned or advanced premiums:
     a. Year-end - current ..................          0     36,885,019         0              0           0         0
     b. Year-end - prior ....................          0     28,991,789         0              0           0         0
 14. Premiums Earned ........................          0    464,607,702         0    110,868,363           0         0
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 15. Amount paid for provision of health
     care services ..........................          0    377,449,752         0    102,821,685           0         0
 16. Amount reported unpaid for provision
     of health care services:
     a. Year-end - current...................          0      5,285,814         0      1,555,441           0         0
     b. Year-end - prior ....................          0     56,988,477         0     19,921,331           0         0
 17. Amount estimated incurred but unreported
     for provision of health care services:
     a. Year-end - current ..................          0     78,866,717         0     17,777,147           0         0
     b. Year-end - prior ....................          0        802,353         0        258,359           0         0
 18. Amount incurred for provision of health
     care services ..........................          0    403,811,453         0    101,974,583           0         0
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

















                                                         980 Jolly Road
[Aetna U.S. Healthcare LOGO]                             P.O. Box 1109
US Healthcare                                            Blue Bell, PA 19422
                                                         215.628.4800
                                                         http://www.ushc.com


December 1, 1997

Mr. Kevin O'Brien                                     Certified # P 505 141 796
St. Peters Medical Center
Partner In Care Corporation
254 Easton Avenue
New Brunswick, NJ 02901








Dear Mr. O'Brien:


Enclosed for your files, please find a fully executed Amendment to the
Health Care Service Agreement between Partners In Care Corporation and Aetna
U.S. Healthcare.


We at Aetna U.S. Healthcare are very pleased that you are continuing your
participation in our network of providers. We look forward to the development of
a long and mutually beneficial relationship.


Should you have any questions or need further assistance, please do not hesitate
to contact me directly at (201) 244-3503.


Sincerely,


Linda Lederman

Linda Lederman

Health Delivery


kjm

Enclosure






AMENDMENT TO THE HEALTH CARE SERVICES AGREEMENT ("HCSA")




between U.S. HEALTHCARE ("AETNA/USHC") and


PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP. ("PIC")





EXECUTED on July 11 and 12, 1995



WHEREAS AETNA/USHC and PIC have recognized that the reconciliation
process outlined in the HCSA does not adequately meet their operational
objectives; and


WHEREAS AETNA/USHC and PIC believe that they will both be better served
by a more frequent reconciliation and by using statewide medical loss data.


NOW THEREFORE, for good and valuable consideration as set forth above,
AETNA/USHC and PIC agree as follows:,


Attachment B to the HCSA is amended by the addition of the following:


1.  Interim Reconciliation. In addition to the final reconciliation (13) months
after the close of any contract year, interim reconciliations and payments
based thereon shall be made upon the following schedule:








-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
  Surplus Payment             For the Contract            Reconciliation Report            % of Surplus or
 Distribution Date                 Period                         Date                    Deficit Paid to or
                                                                                             by PIC at the
                                                                                          Distribution Date
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
November 5, 1997               3/1/97  - 6/30/97            10/97 Paid Thru 9/97           60%
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
February 15, 1998              3/1/97  - 6/30/97            1/98 Paid Thru 12/97           90%
                               7/1/97  - 9/30/97                                           60%
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
May 15, 1998                   3/1/97  - 6/30/97            4/98 Paid Thru 3/98            100%
                               7/1/97  - 9/30/97                                           90%
                               10/1/97 - 12/31/97                                          60%
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
August 15, 1998                3/1/97  - 6/30/97 Final      7/98 Paid Thru 6/98            100%
                               7/1/97  - 9/30/97                                           100%
                               10/1/97 - 12/31/97                                          90%
                               1/1/98  - 3/31/98                                           60%
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
November 15, 1998              7/1/97  - 9/30/97            10/98 Paid Thru 9/98           100%
                               10/1/97 - 12/31/97                                          100%
                               1/1/98  - 3/31/98                                           90%
                               4/1/98  - 6/30/98                                           60%
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
February 15, 1999              10/1/97 - 12/31/97           1/99 Paid Thru 12/98           100%
                               1/1/98  - 3/31/98                                           100%
                               4/1/98  - 6/30/98                                           90%
                               7/1/98  - 9/30/98                                           60%
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
May 15, 1999                   1/1/98  - 3/31/98            4/99 Paid Thru 3/99            100%
                               4/1/98  - 6/30/98                                           100%
                               7/1/98  - 9/30/98                                           90%
                               10/1/98 - 12/31/98                                          60%
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
August 15, 1999                7/1/97  - 6/30/98 Final      7/99 Paid Thru 6/99            100%
                               7/1/98  - 9/30/98                                           100%
                               10/1/98 - 12/31/98                                          90%
                               1/1/99  - 3/31/99                                           60%
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------








Thereafter Quarterly According to the Above Schedule of Quarterly and Final
Annual Reconciliations





If after an interim surplus or deficit distribution is made it is
determined that the distribution was incorrect (for example due to error in
calculation or to a change in the IBNR information), an adjustment will be made
in the next quarterly reconciliation distribution.


Calculation of the surplus or deficit distribution shall be made by
AETNA/USHC based upon AETNA/USHC's reconciliation reports using the data,
methodology, parameters, and formulas used the calculate the August 1997
reconciliation report annexed hereto.


AETNA/USHC shall use the data, methodology, parameters and formulas
used to create the August 1997 reconciliation report and shall not change same
in any way without the written consent of PIC.


2.  The above notwithstanding, Partners in Care's percentage of premium shall
never be less than HMO's Medical Loss Ratio for New Jersey, as
filed with the State of New Jersey Department of Insurance, over the
identical time span. For these purposes and for purposes of reconciliation,
premium requirement and claims paid shall include premium and claims paid as
part of a point of service program offering HMO benefits in conjunction with
indemnity benefits offered by an HMO affiliated insurance company.


In all other respects, the HCSA remains in full force and effect.





PARTNERS IN CARE, CORP.                             AETNA/U.S. HEALTHCARE, INC.







By: John Matuska                                    By: [SIGNATURE ILLEGIBLE]
   -------------------------------                      ------------------------
   John Matuska, President                          Title: Senior Vice President
                                                           ---------------------
Date: October 23, 1997                              Date: November 5, 1997
      ----------------------------                        ----------------------











DATE: 09/16/97
CONTR. YEAR: 07/96 - 06/97





PAID THROUGH 08/97







               SRR135O                                                AETNA US HEALTH
   PRODUCT:    ICRB0076                                                  RECONCILIATION
                                                SUBTOTAL FOR NETWORK: SRR/PARTNERS IN CARE
NETWORK: SRR/PARTNERS IN CARE             COMPANY: FULLY INSURED    PROD: HMO    LOB: COM LOB   SUBTYPE: COM

   DATES OF SERVICE                 JULY        AUG       SEPT         OCT        NOV         DEC        JAN
                                    ====       ====       ====        ====       ====        ====       ====
   MEMBER MONTHS                       0          0          0           0          0           0          0
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
    BASE   72.00%                      0          0          0           0          0           0          0

   PRIMARY FUND
     ALLOCATION                        0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ALLOCATION ADJUST                 0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     CAPITATION PAID                   0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     CAP PAYMENT ADJUST                0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     DISTRIBUTION PAID                 0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ESTIMATED STATUS                  0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ACTUAL STATUS                     0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ESTIMATED YEAR END                0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ACTUAL YEAR END                   0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ADJUSTMENT TO ACTUAL              0          0          0           0          0           0          0
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
   PRIMARY FUND BALANCE                0          0          0           0          0           0          0

   SPECIALIST FUND
     ALLOCATION                        0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ALLOCATION ADJUST                 0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     CAPITATION PAID                   0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     CAP PAID ADJUST                   0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ALLOCATION PAID                   0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ALLOCATION PAID ADJUST            0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     CLAIMS PAID                       0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     CLAIMS ADJUST                     0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     CLAIMS IBNR                       0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     SQCCS ACTUAL PAYMENT              0          O          0           0          0           0          0
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
   SPECIALIST FUND BALANCE             0          O          0           0          0           0          0

   FACILITIES FUND
     ALLOCATION                        0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ALLOCATION ADJUST                 0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ALLOCATION PAID                   0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ALLOCATION PAID ADJUST            0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     CLAIMS PAID                       0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     CLAIMS ADJUST                     0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     CLAIMS IBNR                       0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     OTHER ASSESSMENTS                 0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ACTUAL CAPTAINER PAYMENTS         0          0          0           0          0           0          0
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
   FACILITIES FUND BALANCE             0          0          0           0          0           0          0

     RISK PROTECTION PREMIUM           0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     RISK PROTECTION RECOVERY          0          0          0           0          0           0          0
   RISK PROTECTION BALANCE             0          0          0           0          0           0          0

   SURPLUS / (DEFICIT)                 0          0          0           0          0           0          0



   DATES OF SERVICE                 FEB         MAR          APR          MAY          JUNE          YTD
                                   ====        ====         ====         ====          ====         ====
   MEMBER MONTHS                       0      5,298        5,339        5,573         5.586       21,796
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
     BASE   72.00%                     0      5,298        5,339        5,573         5,586       21,796

   PRIMARY FUND
     ALLOCATION                        0     62,958       62,983       66,488        66,126      258,555
     ALLOCATION ADJUST                 0        197          232            0             0          430
     CAPITATION PAID                   0    (70.111)     (70,847)     (76,122)      (74,618)    (291,697)
     CAP PAYMENT ADJUST                0     (2,127)      (2,013)      (4,546)       (2,187)     (10,933)
     DISTRIBUTION PAID                 0     (8,016)      (8.581)     (10,230)       (9,960)     (36,187)
     ESTIMATED STATUS                  0     (3,074)      (3,150)      (3,518)       (3,330)     (13,071)
     ACTUAL STATUS                     0          0            0            0       (13,611)     (13,611)
     ESTIMATED YEAR END                0          0            0            0             0            0
     ACTUAL YEAR END                   0          0            0            0             0            0
     ADJUSTMENT TO ACTUAL              0      1,216        1,252        1,489         1,346        5,304
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
   PRIMARY FUND BALANCE                0    (18,957)     (20,183)     (26,438)      (22,622)     (88,200)

   SPECIALIST FUND
     ALLOCATION                        0    197,849      198,603      208,560       208,503      813,515
     ALLOCATION ADJUST                 0      8,681        8,877        8,491         8,501       34,549
     CAPITATION PAID                   0    (23,549)     (24,203)     (24,898)      (25,884)     (98,534)
     CAP PAID ADJUST                   0        (41)         (63)           0             0         (103)
     ALLOCATION PAID                   0          0            0            0             0            0
     ALLOCATION PAID ADJUST            0          0            0            0             0            0
     CLAIMS PAID                       0   (146,544)    (107,344)    (110,369)      (94,968)    (459,224)
     CLAIMS ADJUST                     0          0            0            0             0            0
     CLAIMS IBNR                       0    (27,747)     (22,095)     (38,577)      (41,519)    (129,938)
     SQCCS ACTUAL PAYMENT              0          0            0            0             0            0
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
   SPECIALIST FUND BALANCE             0      8,649       53,775       43,207        54,633      160,264

   FACILITIES FUND
     ALLOCATION                        0    280,107      281,705      295,416       295,841    1,153,069
     ALLOCATION ADJUST                 0     14,161       14,515       14,064        13,990       56,730
     ALLOCATION PAID                   0          0            0            0             0            0
     ALLOCATION PAID ADJUST            0          0            0            0             0            0
     CLAIMS PAID                       0   (204,414)     (79,069)     (75,435)      (94,873)    (453,791)
     CLAIMS ADJUST                     0          0            0            0             O           0
     CLAIMS IBNR                       0    (24,750)     (12,925)     (21,426)      (41,380)    (100,480)
     OTHER ASSESSMENTS                 0          0            0            0             0            0
     ACTUAL CAPTAINER PAYMENTS         0          0            0            0             0            0
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
   FACILITIES FUND BALANCE             0     65,104      204,226      212,619       173,579      655,528

     RISK PROTECTION PREMIUM           0          0            0            0             0            0
     RISK PROTECTION RECOVERY          0          0            0            0             0            0
   RISK PROTECTION BALANCE             0          0            0            0             0            0

   SURPLUS / (DEFICIT)                 0     54,797      237,818      229,387       205,590      727,592











DATE: 09/16/97
CONTR. YEAR: 07/97 - 06/98





PAID THROUGH 08/97







               SRR135O                                                AETNA US HEALTH
   PRODUCT:    ICRB0076                                                  RECONCILIATION
                                                SUBTOTAL FOR NETWORK: SRR/PARTNERS IN CARE
   NETWORK: SRR/PARTNERS IN CARE               COMPANY: FULLY INSURED  PROD: HMO     LOB: COM   LOB SUBTYPE: COM

   DATES OF SERVICE                 JULY        AUG       SEPT         OCT        NOV         DEC        JAN
                                    ====       ====       ====        ====       ====        ====       ====
   MEMBER MONTHS                   5,826          0          0           0          0           0          0
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
    BASE   72.00%                  5,826          0          0           0          0           0          0

   PRIMARY FUND
     ALLOCATION                   68,974          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ALLOCATION ADJUST                 0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     CAPITATION PAID             (74,943)         0          0           0          0           0          0
     CAP PAYMENT ADJUST             (529)         0          0           0          0           0          0
     DISTRIBUTION PAID           (12,737)         0          0           0          0           0          0
     ESTIMATED STATUS            (13,269)         0          0           0          0           0          0
     ACTUAL STATUS                     0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ESTIMATED YEAR END                0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ACTUAL YEAR END                   0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ADJUSTMENT TO ACTUAL          1,368          0          0           0          0           0          0
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
   PRIMARY FUND BALANCE          (21,137)         0          0           0          0           0          0

   SPECIALIST FUND
     ALLOCATION                  227,666          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ALLOCATION ADJUST                 0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     CAPITATION PAID             (26,835)         0          0           0          0           0          0
     CAP PAID ADJUST                   0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ALLOCATION PAID                   0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ALLOCATION PAID ADJUST            0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     CLAIMS PAID                 (48,422)         0          0           0          0           0          0
     CLAIMS ADJUST                     0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     CLAIMS IBNR                 (68,313)         0          0           0          0           0          0
     SQCCS ACTUAL PAYMENT              0          0          0           0          0           0          0
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
   SPECIALIST FUND BALANCE        84,097          0          0           0          0           0          0

   FACILITIES FUND
     ALLOCATION                  322,920          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ALLOCATION ADJUST                 0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ALLOCATION PAID                   0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ALLOCATION PAID ADJUST            0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     CLAIMS PAID                 (60,643)         0          0           0          0           0          0
     CLAIMS ADJUST                     0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     CLAIMS IBNR                 (94,177)         0          0           0          0           0          0
     OTHER ASSESSMENTS                 0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     ACTUAL CAPTAINER PAYMENTS         0          0          0           0          0           0          0
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
   FACILITIES FUND BALANCE       168,100          0          0           0          0           0          0

     RISK PROTECTION PREMIUM           0          0          0           0          0           0          0
     RISK PROTECTION RECOVERY          0          0          0           0          0           0          0
   RISK PROTECTION BALANCE             0          0          0           0          0           0          0

   SURPLUS / (DEFICIT)           231,060          0          0           0          0           0          0



   DATES OF SERVICE                FEB         MAR          APR          MAY          JUNE          YTD
                                  ====        ====         ====         ====          ====         ====
   MEMBER MONTHS                     0           0            0            0             0        5,826
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
    BASE   72.00%                    0           0            0            0             0        5,826

   PRIMARY FUND
     ALLOCATION                      0           0            0            0             0       68,974
     ALLOCATION ADJUST               0           0            0            0             0            0
     CAPITATION PAID                 0           0            0            0             0      (74,943)
     CAP PAYMENT ADJUST              0           0            0            0             0         (529)
     DISTRIBUTION PAID               0           0            0            0             0      (12,737)
     ESTIMATED STATUS                0           0            0            0             0       (3,269)
     ACTUAL STATUS                   0           0            0            0             0            0
     ESTIMATED YEAR ENO              0           0            0            0             0            0
     ACTUAL YEAR ENO                 0           0            0            0             0            0
     ADJUSTMENT TO ACTUAL            0           0            0            0             0        1,368
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
   PRIMARY FUND BALANCE              0           0            0            0             0      (21,137)

   SPECIALIST FUND
     ALLOCATION                      0           0            0            0             0      227,666
     ALLOCATION ADJUST               0           0            0            0             0            0
     CAPITATION PAID                 0           0            0            0             0      (26,835)
     CAP PAID ADJUST                 0           0            0            0             0            0
     ALLOCATION PAID                 0           0            0            0             0            0
     ALLOCATION PAID ADJUST          0           0            0            0             0            0
     CLAIMS PAID                     0           0            0            0             0      (48,422)
     CLAIMS ADJUST                   0           0            0            0             0            0
     CLAIMS 18HR                     0           0            0            0             0      (68,313)
     SQCCS ACTUAL PAYMENT            0           0            0            0             0            0
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
   SPECIALIST FUND BALANCE           0           0            0            0             0       84,097

   FACILITIES FUND
     ALLOCATION                      0           0            0            0             0      322,920
     ALLOCATION ADJUST               0           0            0            0             0            0
     ALLOCATION PAID                 0           0            0            0             0            0
     ALLOCATION PAID ADJUST          0           0            0            0             0            0
     CLAIMS PAID                     0           0            0            0             0      (60,643)
     CLAIMS ADJUST                   0           0            0            0             0            0
     CLAIMS IBHR                     0           0            0            0             0      (94,177)
     OTHER ASSESSMENTS               0           0            0            0             0            0
     ACTUAL CAPTAINER PAYMENTS       0           0            0            0             0            0
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
   FACILITIES FUND BALANCE           0           0            0            0             0      168,100

     RISK PROTECTION PREMIUM         0           0            0            0             0            0
     RISK PROTECTION RECOVERY        0           0            0            0             0            0
   RISK PROTECTION BALANCE           0           0            0            0             0            0

   SURPLUS / (DEFICIT)               0           0            0            0             0      231,060












U.S. HEALTHCARE



Please complete and return this form with the signed agreement.





PROVIDER: PARTNERS IN CARE CORPORATION









MAILING ADDRESS:               254 Easton Avenue
                               -------------------------------------------------
                               New Brunswick, New Jersey 08901
                               -------------------------------------------------
                               Attention: Kevin O'Brien
                               -------------------------------------------------

                               -------------------------------------------------

REIMBURSEMENT ADDRESS:         254 Easton Avenue
                               -------------------------------------------------
                               New Brunswick, New Jersey 08901
                               -------------------------------------------------
                               Attention: Kevin O'Brien
                               -------------------------------------------------

                               -------------------------------------------------

MAIN TELEPHONE NUMBER:         (908) 745-8593
                               -------------------------------------------------
CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER:       Interim: John Matuska
                               -------------------------------------------------
CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:       Interim: Gerald Tofani
                               -------------------------------------------------
BUSINESS OFFICE MANAGER:       Interim: Kevin O'Brien
                               -------------------------------------------------
FEDERAL TAX I.D. NUMBER:       22-2727271
                               -------------------------------------------------
CONTACT PERSON:                Interim: Susan J. Warner
                               -------------------------------------------------
SERVICE AREA:                  Central New Jersey
                               -------------------------------------------------

                               -------------------------------------------------

                               -------------------------------------------------
SERVICE LOCATION(S):           Central New Jersey
                               -------------------------------------------------

                               -------------------------------------------------

                               -------------------------------------------------












HEALTH CARE SERVICES AGREEMENT



This Agreement is between U.S. Healthcare/The Health Maintenance
Organization of New Jersey, Inc., ("HMO") and Partners In Care, Inc.
("Provider"). Its purpose is to establish a health care delivery system ("the
System") to be provided by Provider for the benefit of HMO members.


I. Provider's Services - Provider will arrange for the provision of
complete medical services through its own network of providers for HMO members
who elect primary care physician (PCP) offices designated for the System
("Members"). Attachment "C", hereto lists the designated offices. The parties
may, from time to time during the term of this Agreement, mutually agree to add
or delete designated offices, in which case Attachment "C" will be amended.
Provider will provide all members' basic benefits and services as contained in
HMO's service agreement for its state and federally approved pre-paid health
care program. These benefits and services will be available to all Members on an
equal, non-discriminatory basis with Provider's other patients, if any. Provider
will also participate fully in HMO's specially developed benefit and cost
containment programs, such as Li'1 Appleseed and Home Care. A further
specification of benefits and services to be provided is attached hereto and
incorporated herein as Attachment "A". The parties may, only by mutual
agreement, add or delete certain benefits and services from those to be provided
under this agreement. Provider shall not be required to provide services as set
forth in paragraph 22 below,


2. HMO's Duties - HMO at its sole cost and expense will market the System,
enroll members, procure and maintain all regulatory approvals, process claims,
collect and process all premium payments made by and on behalf of Members,
disburse payments to Provider and provide its customary assistance in
administration of the program, including data collection and computerized
reports, membership verification, a member relations program and a grievance
process.


3. Compensation to Provider. Prior to reaching the enrollment of 5,000 Members
through Provider's PCP's, compensation to members of the Provider's provider
network shall be paid in accordance with the rates contained in: the Managed
Care Agreement between HMO and St. Peter's Medical Center, the Primary Care
Physician Agreement between HMO and the Provider's PCP's and the Specialist Care
Agreement between the HMO and the Provider's specialist physicians (hereinafter
collectively referred to as the "Fee for Service Agreements"). Additionally,
prior to reaching the enrollment of 5,000 Members, members of the Provider's
provider network may be paid on a fee for service / case rate basis on such case
rates as may be developed by the Joint Operations Committee and approved in
writing by the parties to this Agreement. Upon reaching the 5,000 enrollment
trigger, as compensation for services to be provided per this Agreement,
Provider will be paid at the rates set forth on the attached compensation
schedule (Attachment B). The above notwithstanding, certain of HMO's Members are
enrolled with HMO on an administrative services only ("ASO"), non-risk basis,
and compensation to the members of Provider's provider network with regard to
said Members shall remain as set forth in the Fee for Service Agreements unless
otherwise agreed to by both parties. The ASO membership will not be counted in
the calculation of the 5,000 Member conversion threshold.


Provider will also be entitled to collect and retain from Members the nominal
copayments permitted in the Member's HMO agreement. Provider agrees to
accept the payments provided for in this


1 of 7





Agreement as full and complete compensation hereunder and at no time will
Provider seek compensation from Members except for copayments authorized by
HMO's group contracts.


Provider hereby agrees that in no event, including, but not limited to
non-payment by the HMO, HMO insolvency or breach of this agreement, shall
Provider bill, charge, collect a deposit from, seek compensation, remuneration
or reimbursement from, or have any recourse against Member or persons other HMO
acting on their behalf for services listed in this Agreement. This provision
shall not prohibit collection of supplemental charges or copayments on HMO's
behalf made in accordance with the terms of the agreement between HMO and
Member. Provider further agrees that (1) the hold harmless provision herein
shall survive the termination of this Agreement regardless of the cause giving
rise to termination and shall be construed to be for the benefit of the HMO
Member and that (2) this hold harmless provision supersedes any oral or written
contrary agreement now existing or hereafter entered into between Provider and
Member or persons acting on Member's behalf. Any modification, addition, or
deletion to the provisions of this section will become effective on a date no
earlier than thirty-one (31) days after the Department of Insurance has received
written notice of such proposed change.


4. Subcontracts. Provider may, with the prior written approval of HMO enter into
subcontracts for services, and/or facilities to be provided hereunder. All such
subcontracts must be in writing and previously approved by HMO, which shall use
the same criteria for acceptance that it uses for its own contracts for similar
services, and facilities. The same requirement of a written agreement and rights
of review and approval shall exist with respect to employment agreements should
Provider choose to hire health care professionals to discharge any of its
obligations hereunder.


5. Cooperation - Provider and HMO will maintain an effective liaison and close
cooperation with each other to provide maximum benefits at reasonable costs
consistent with acceptable standards of medical practice. Provider will comply
with HMO administrative policies and procedures, including those related to the
delivery of medical services, and will keep and make available such medical,
financial and other records as HMO requires for the System and its Members,
including without limitation, patient encounter forms as and when prescribed by
HMO. A sample HMO enrollment form showing the integrated information release
language, is attached as Exhibit 1. Upon prior written request HMO may make
available to Provider such medical, financial and other records as Provider may
require for Provider's internal quality assurance and resource utilization
purposes and as Provider may require to confirm the accuracy of HMO's
calculation of payment due to Provider. HMO shall not unreasonably deny access
to pertinent information.


6. Notices - Any notice required to be given pursuant to this Agreement shall be
in writing and hand delivered or sent certified or register mail to the Provider
at:



President




Partners In Care, Inc.




254 Easton Avenue



New Brunswick, New Jersey 08903


with a copy to:


2 of 7






Michael J. Baker, Esq.




Hoagland, Longo, Moran, Dunst & Doukas




P.0. Box 480



New Brunswick, NJ 08903.


and to HMO at:



U.S. Healthcare, Inc.



Attn.: Contracts Manager



980 Jolly Road



P.O. Box 1109


Blue Bell, PA. 19422


7. Complaints - Provider agrees to cooperate with and provide HMO with the
information necessary to resolve HMO Member grievances with respect to Provider
Services.


8. Quality Assurance - HMO uses a system of utilization/quality assurance/peer
review based on standards established by federal and state law to promote
adherence to accepted medical standards and encourage participating physicians
to keep medical costs at a minimum level consistent with sound medical
treatment. To this end, Provider agrees to cooperate with HMO's program, the
cost of which shall be borne by HMO, and to provide such records as hospital
discharge and other medical records as it may be authorized to provide, as well
as assistance that HMO may request for its utilization monitoring and review.
HMO shall provide sixty (60) days prior written notice of changes to these
programs.


9. Roster - Except as set forth in paragraph 22 below, HMO may use Provider's
name, address, telephone number, descriptions of services and other information,
and similar information related to health professionals providing services to
the System. HMO shall use Provider's name in HMO's Provider manual in reference
to Providers primary care and specialty physicians. Provider's specialists may
request to not be listed in the general specialist directory. Provider will
obtain any necessary related consents (in writing). Provider agrees, when
requested by HMO, to furnish HMO a current list of participating physicians and
other health professionals performing services within the System. The list will
include names, specialties (as applicable, board status, association memberships
and relationship to Provider).


10. Independent Contractors - The parties are independent contractors. Neither
is an employee, agent or representative of the other. Consequently, neither will
have authority to enter agreements or make any commitments on behalf of the
other unless expressly authorized in writing.


11. Insurance - Each party will maintain, at its own expense, general and
professional liability and such other insurance as necessary to insure itself,
its agents and employees against any claim or action for damages related to this
Agreement or its performance. The limits of malpractice liability


3 of 7





shall not be less than $1,000,000 per claim and $3,000,000 per aggregate.
Provider further agrees to indemnify and hold harmless HMO against any claims or
liabilities arising under this paragraph which are the sole responsibility of
Provider. HMO further agrees to indemnify and hold harmless Provider against any
claims or liabilities arising under this paragraph which are the sole
responsibility of HMO.


12. Term of Agreement - This Agreement shall be effective for three (3) years
from July 1, 1995. Neither Party may terminate this Agreement for convenience
during the initial term. Thereafter, this agreement shall be renewed for an
additional three (3) year Period unless terminated by either party at its sole
discretion and option by a written notice thereof mailed to the other party by
certified or registered mail at least one-hundred eighty (180) days prior to
July 1, 1998. On termination, the rights of each party shall terminate. However,
Provider may be required by HMO to complete treatment of persons then being
treated and HMO shall reimburse Provider for any such treatment pursuant to
Paragraph 3 of this Agreement.


This Agreement may be terminated for cause at any time by either party if the
other has breached any term or condition of this Agreement and the breach has
not been cured within 30 days after written notice of intent to terminate is
received.


13. Confidentiality - The parties agree to treat Member medical records as
confidential so as to comply with all applicable law.


14. Assignment and Delegation - Because of the special nature of Provider's
services, Provider may not assign any rights (except to an accounting or billing
agent) or delegate any duties of this Agreement without the express prior
written consent of HMO, which consent shall be attached to and incorporated
within this Agreement. Any purported assignment, subcontract or delegation in
derogation of this prohibition shall be null and void. HMO may, for business
purposes, assign its rights and/or delegate its obligations to a subsidiary,
affiliate or successor in interest. Any other assignment of this agreement by
HMO shall require the prior written consent of Provider, which consent shall be
attached to and incorporated within this Agreement.


15. Modification - This Agreement can only be amended by a writing signed by
both parties.


16. Affirmative Action Program - HMO is an Equal Opportunity Employer which
maintains an Affirmative Action Program. The parties agree that they will comply
with Executive Order 11246, the Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Act of 1974,
the Drug Free Workplace Act of 1988, and the Vocational Rehabilitation Act in
transactions relating to any government contract.


17. NON-HMO Program Participation - Services under this Agreement may be made
available to Members of the PPO, licensed insurer, Workers' Compensation and
managed care plans affiliated with HMO ("the Plans"). Provider will have the
option to notify HMO in writing which plans(s) it intends to exclude from this
agreement 90 days prior to the effective date of that exclusion. Provider agrees
that it will provide services for the Plans under the then current compensation
agreement with HMO. Upon prior approval of Provider, HMO may designate the
undersigned Provider as a participant or non-participant in any specific Plan.


4 of 7





18. Confidentiality and Non-Disclosure - This Agreement and the terms and
conditions herein shall be treated by the parties as strictly confidential.
Accordingly, the parties agree not to directly or indirectly disclose this
Agreement or the terms and conditions herein, including but not limited to all
schedules and financial terms, to any third party. The parties agree that the
breach or prospective breach of this provision will cause irreparable harm for
which money damages may not be adequate. The parties therefore agree that in
addition to any other remedies, the non-breaching party shall be entitled to
injunctive or other equitable relief to restrain the breach hereof. This
provision shall not apply to disclosures required by law, provided such
disclosure is limited to the extent required by law. This paragraph shall
survive termination of this Agreement.


19. Non Competition/Non-Solicitation - During the term of this Agreement, from
July 1, 1995 forward, Provider (including St. Peter's Medical Center) will not
directly or indirectly operate or file for a license to operate, directly or
indirectly, a Health Maintenance Organization (HMO), Preferred Provider
Organization (PPO) or other managed care plan in the HMO service area. After
that period, in the event that Provider (including St. Peter's Medical Center)
intends to file for a license to operate, purchase, or be acquired by an HMO,
PPO, or other managed care plan, Provider shall give HMO six (6) months prior
written notice of such intention, during which time Provider may not purchase,
operate or be acquired by such an HMO, PPO, or other managed care plan. In the
event Provider receives notice of any affiliate, subsidiary, or parent's action
of filing or intent to file a license to operate, purchase, or be acquired by an
HMO, PPO, or other managed care plan, Provider shall notify HMO immediately in
writing of such affiliate, subsidiary or parent's intent or action.


20. Monthly Reports - HMO shall supply monthly reports, in raw data and report
formats, to Provider regarding claims and encounter information sufficient for
Provider to accurately track resource utilization and performance indicators.
The data shall be comprehensive and include specialists, primary care
physicians, hospital and other provider information regarding the systems'
members. The lag time between initial submission of claim by member and
incorporation of said member's data in the aforesaid report shall not be
greater than 60 days.


21. Joint Operations Committee - In order to foster cooperation and efficient
coordination between Provider and HMO, the parties shall form a joint operations
committee. This committee shall be staffed by both parties and shall meet on a
bi-weekly basis during the first year of the term of this agreement and
regularly as needed thereafter. The committee shall adopt and implement policies
including, but not limited to, the following: Creation of an easy and convenient
membership verification system for the Provider physicians and hospital, dealing
with intra-practice coverage issues, establishing a provider grievance
procedure, for the Provider, physician, hospital and other members of its
provider network, review of specialist referral patterns and utilization, coding
and re-bundling issues, changes in HMO's utilization management program or
administrative requirements, and the establishment of case rates where
appropriate.


22. Directives for Catholic Institutions - Provider shall not be required under
this agreement to provide any services it deems to be contrary to or
inconsistent with the Directives for Catholic Health Care Institutions. Members
of the Providers Network shall not be required, or permitted to


5 of 7





provide any such services to Members through or under the auspices of Provider.
In keeping with this policy, HMO shall not include Provider or members of its
network who are identified as such in any printed materials, audio or video
tapes, or in any other medium of advertisement or communication in such a way so
as to directly or indirectly imply that Provider, or members of its network
perform services which are inconsistent with or contrary to said Directives.
As an example of the policy outlined above, HMO shall not include Provider, or
physicians or Hospitals identified as members of Provider's network in any
communication which discusses the provision of abortion or sterilization
services, without a clear and prominent statement that, St. Peter's Medical
Center does not provide abortion or sterilization services and that members of
the Partner's in Care network do not provide abortion or sterilization services
through Partners in Care. If HMO so desires, it may submit to Provider for
review and approval, any materials to be used by HMO in which any information
concerning Provider or members of Providers provider network will appear.
Provider will, within 5 business days after receiving such material, advise HMO
in writing either (i) that the materials are acceptable, or (ii) that such
materials are not acceptable, in which case provider will provide the basis for
its determination. The parties agree that the breach or prospective breach of
this provision will cause irreparable harm for which money damages may not be
adequate. The parties therefore agree that in addition to any other remedies,
the non-breaching party shall be entitled to injunctive or other equitable
relief to restrain the breach hereof.


23. Waiver - The waiver by either party of a breach or violation of any
provision of this Agreement shall not operate as or be construed to be a waiver
of any subsequent breach thereof.


24. Governing Law - This Agreement shall be governed in all respects by the
laws of the State of New Jersey.


25. Severability - Any determination that any provision of this Agreement or any
application thereof is invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect in any
instance shall not affect the validity, legality and enforceability of such
provision in any other instance, or the validity, legality or enforceability of
another provision of this Agreement.


26. Noninterference - HMO agrees that during the initial term of this Agreement
and any renewal(s) thereof or the one-hundred eighty (180) day period following
termination of this agreement, HMO will not:


a. Take any action or make any communication to PIC Participating
Physicians or other parties which undermines or could reasonably be expected to
undermine the relationship between PIC and army of its participating physicians,
and;


b. Endeavor in any manner to contract directly with an PIC Participating
Physician or offer any PIC Participation Physician compensation under terms and
conditions that are not available to all other PIC Participating Physicians of
the same specialty.


27. Network Open Status - Provider agrees that, during the initial term and all
subsequent renewal terms, Provider will not close to additional HMO Members
while remaining open to new enrollments from other managed care organizations.


6 of 7





28. Re-negotiation - The specialists reimbursement program as outlined in the
Specialist Physicians agreement schedule "A", would be reopened for good faith
negotiation should the rates contained in HMO's Reasonable, Equitable Fee (REF)
Schedule be reduced overall by 10%. The Joint Operations Committee, as defined
in section 21 above, shall be charged with the determination of the degree of
change in the REF schedule. If a mutually agreeable resolution has not been
achieved at the end of the ninety (90) day period, Provider may terminate the
agreement upon giving ninety (90) days written notice.



U.S. HEALTHCARE/THE HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION OF NEW JERSEY, INC.




By:   Tim Nolan






TIM NOLAN



Title:



Date:   July 14, 1995







PARTNERS IN CARE, INC.







   By:   Joseph Leddy                      By:       John Matuska
       ----------------------------                ----------------------------
         JOSEPH LEDDY, M.D.                          JOHN MATUSKA

Title: Chairman of the Board of Directors    Title: Interim Executive Director

 Date:   11 July 95                          Date:   7/11/95
       ------------------------                    ------------------------








7 of 7






ATTACHMENT A

TO THE

HEALTH CARE SERVICES AGREEMENT




BENEFITS AND SERVICES



Provider:       Partners In Care, Corp.


Effective Date:       July 1, 1995


A. Primary Physician Benefits: Outpatient. Except in case of emergency, the
benefits listed below will be provided to Members only at or through the HMO
medical office shown on Member's Identification card. Non-emergency services to
be performed outside the office of a Participating Primary Physician must be
specifically authorized by a Participating Primary Physician by means of a prior
written referral. Such a referral must be obtained through the HMO Medical
Office shown on Member's identification card. Member is responsible for the
appropriate co-payment per office visit during office hours, non-office hours.
and for home visits. Copayments are dependent upon Plan selected by member.


1. Office visits to Participating Primary Physician during office
hours, including well-child care from birth;


2. Office visits when medically necessary to Participating Primary
Physician during non-office hours;


3. Home visits when medically necessary, as determined by Member's
Participating Primary Physician;


4. Additional benefits, for laboratory and x-ray services,
radiotherapy, casts, dressings, and injections, when medically
necessary and appropriate, and administered by Participating Health
Professionals at the office of Participating Primary Physicians. In
addition, short term rehabilitation services and physical therapy, the
provision of which, the Member's Participating Primary Physician
determines, can be expected to result in the significant improvement of
a Member's condition within a period of two months. If these services
are to be performed outside the office of a Participating Primary
Physician, they must be specifically authorized by a Participating
Primary Physician by means of a prior written referral.


5. Emergency care on a twenty-four (24) hour-a-day basis;


6. Periodic health examination, immunizations (but not solely for
travel), and other measures for the prevention and detection of
disease, including instruction in personal health care measures, and
formation on proper and timely use of appropriate medical resources as
provided by or through HMO;


7. Medical social services, in support of provision of covered health
services. These benefits shall include pre- and post-hospital planning,
referral to (but not payment for) services provided through community
health and social welfare agencies, and referral to (but not payment
for) related family counseling services:


1 of 7





8. Health education and information as provided from time to time by
HMO and Participating Providers and medical offices:


9. Home health services provided by a Participating Home Health Agency,
when ordered by Member's Participating Primary Physician; but not
including meals, housekeeping, and personal comfort and convenience
items;


10. Ambulance service, when medically necessary and authorized by
Member's Participating Primary Physician, in accordance with the
notification provisions of Section F.2. - Benefits and Services.


11. Other preventive health services:


a. Subject to the provisions of paragraph 22 of this Health Care
Services Agreement. Family planning services, with referral to
and payment for services of appropriate agencies as necessary;


b. Subject to the provisions of paragraph 22 of this Health Care
Services Agreement. Services for infertility, with referral to
and payment for services of appropriate specialists as necessary
except injectables unless medically necessary;


c. Eye examinations, with referral to and payment for services
of appropriate specialists as necessary.


d. Ear examinations to determine the need for hearing
correction;


B. Specialist Physician Benefits - Outpatients. The benefits listed below
will be provided without co-payment to members (except where noted) when
referrered by a Participating Primary Physician to a Participating
Specialist Physician by means of a prior referral;


1. Office visits to Participating Specialist Physicians or
Participating Outpatient Departments during office hours. The
specialist or hospital services provided include but are not limited
to:


Allergy (except injections, which must be administered by a
Participating Primary Physician)
Anesthesia

Cardiology

Endocrinology

Gynecology and Obstetrics (except periodic preventive exams:

e.g., pap tests, routine medical gynecology, which must be
administered by a participating Primary Physician)
Internal Medicine
Oncology


2 of 7





Ophthalmology

Oral Surgery (only for infections, diseases or injuries of jaw
or bony impactions of teeth)
Orthopedics

Otolaryngology

Pathology

Pediatrics

Radiology (x-rays. except dental x-rays)
Surgery

Urology


2. Emergency visits to a Participating Specialist Physician during
non-office hours, when medically necessary. Member is responsible for
appropriate co-payment as determined by plan for each such visit.
These visits do not require prior written referral, but will be
reviewed for payment in accordance with the rules set forth in Section

F., Benefits and Services.


C. Physician Benefits- Inpatient. The following benefits are available only at
HMO Participating Hospitals and Participated Skilled Nursing Facilities when the
Member is referred by Member's Participating Primary Physician by means of a
prior written referral except for emergency services as described in Section F.

- Benefits and Services.


1. Unlimited physician services (other than for mental illness) when
referred by Member's Participating Primary Physician, including
pre-operative and post-operative surgical, medical, obstetrical and
anesthesia services.


2. The services of all specialists listed in Section 8.1. - Benefits
and Services when medically necessary and when referred by Member's
Participating Primary Physician by means of a prior written referral or
prior referral as recorded in the hospital records of the case.


D. Hospital and Skilled Nursing Facility Benefits - Inpatient. The following
benefits (other than for mental illness and physical therapy) are provided at
Participating Hospitals and Participating Skilled Nursing Facilities when Member
is admitted upon the instruction of a Participating Physician and with a prior
written referral from Member's Primary Physician, except for emergency services
as described in Section F, Benefits and Services:


1. Unlimited benefits for semi-private accommodations. When medically
necessary, private accommodations will be provided upon certification
of Member's Participating Primary Physician. Should a private room be
occupied when not certified to be medically necessary, the benefit
hereunder shall be limited to payment by HMO to the Participating
Hospital of Facility of the per diem or other agreed upon rate
established between HMO and such facility. In such cases. Member shall
be liable directly to the Participating Hospital or Participating
Skilled Nursing Facility for the difference between such benefit and
the private room charge Hospital and Skilled Nursing Facility benefits
shall include, but are not limited to:


Room and Board

General Nursing Care

Use of intensive or special care facilities when medically
necessary

X-ray examination (except dental x-rays)
Use of operating room and related facilities
Encephalography

Drugs, medications, biologicals, as necessary
Cardiography


3 of 7





Laboratory testing and services
Ear and hearing examinations
Special tests when medically necessary
Nuclear Medicine

Physical and rehabilitation therapy as appropriate
Oxygen and oxygen therapy
Anesthesia

Anesthesia services

Administration of blood, blood plasma and blood derivatives (the
blood itself is not a covered benefit)
Intravenous injections and solutions
Surgical, medical and obstetrical services provided by the
hospital

Pre-operative and post-operative care
Private duty nursing when medically necessary and ordered by the
referred

Participating Specialist Physician in concurrence with Member's
Primary Physician


2. Benefits in Skilled Nursing Facilities as described above shall be
limited to those medically necessary and as defined in the Medicare Law
as Skilled Nursing Care.


E. Speech Therapy Benefits. Benefits are provided, only when referred by
Member's Participating Primary Physician, by means of a prior written referral,
in and by Participating Providers as follows:


3. Speech Therapy - Outpatient or Inpatient. Benefits are provided
only in cases of cerebral vascular accident or other neurologic damage,
congenital problems stemming from birth defects, accidental trauma,
deafness, when the institution of speech therapy would preclude the
further progression of a pathogenic condition, or in the case of
complete loss of speech for psychiatric reasons. In such cases, the
benefits are limited to twenty (20) visits in any 365 day period. In
the case of complete loss of speech for psychiatric reasons, the
copayment structure provided in Section E.1, -Benefits and Services,
applies. In all cases, a visit as used herein is defined as fifty (50)
minutes or more of therapy.


4 of 7





F. Emergency and Out-of-Area Benefits. Members shall receive the following
benefits under emergency conditions:


1. HMO will reimburse Member for the reasonable cost of medical and
hospital services by non-participating providers, when and only when the
condition so treated required treatment of an immediate nature.
Determinations of covered conditions under this Section F - Benefits and
Services will be made by the HMO Quality Assurance (Medical Review)
Committee. Examples of such conditions are: unusual or excessive bleeding;
broken bones, acute abdominal or chest pains, suspected heart attacks;
sudden, persistent pain, serious injuries or burns; poisonings;
unconsciousness; convulsions, or difficulty in breathing. The HMO Quality
Assurance Committee may determine that similarly acute conditions are also
emergencies. Care that would normally be rendered on a primary care basis
is not considered an emergency for purposes of HMO coverage.


2. Persons claiming benefits under this Section must, whenever possible,
notify either their Participating Primary Physician or HMO of the emergency
immediately (within 48 hours) and must give written proof of the
occurrence, character and extent of emergency services. This written notice
must be received by HMO within ninety (90) days after the date services
were rendered. Failure to immediately notify or to furnish such written
proof within the time required will not invalidate or reduce any claim for
reimbursement if it can be shown that notification and proof were given as
soon as was reasonably possible. Reimbursement will be made only upon
receipt of proper written proof.


3. Reimbursement for emergency care by a non-participating provider, in or
outside the HMO area, is limited to expenses incurred prior to the time
Member's condition, in the opinion of HMO, reasonably permitted him or her
to travel or to be transported to the nearest HMO Participating Provider,
or to receive follow-up care from a Participating Provider, upon referral
by the Member's Participating Primary Physician. Transportation costs will
be reimbursed only to the extent medically necessary in the circumstances.


4. Reimbursement may be subject to payment by Member of all co-payments
which would have been required, had similar benefits been supplied during
office hours, on a deferred basis, by a PIC provider.


5. Member will be responsible for an emergency service co-payment for each
incidence of the use of outpatient emergency services at a Physician's
office. Member will be responsible for an emergency service co-payment for
each incidence of the use of outpatient emergency services at a hospital
emergency room or hospital outpatient department. Copayments are dependent
upon Plan selected by member.


6. Only those services covered in non-emergency situations under this
Contract are covered in emergency situations. The services set forth in
Exclusions and Limitations below are excluded in non-emergency and
emergency circumstances.


G. Physical Therapy. Benefits are provided for short term rehabilitation
services and physical therapy, the provision of which the Member's Participating
Primary Physician determines can be expected to result in the significant
improvement of a Member's condition within a period of two months.


5 of 7






Exclusions and Limitations



The following are excluded from coverage under the Contract, and are not
provided as benefits:


A. Any service provided without prior referral from Member's Participating
Primary Physician, except in emergencies (see Section F. - Benefits and
Services);


B. Plastic operations for cosmetic or beautification purposes except when made
medically necessary as a result of accidental injuries or congenital defects or
to correct or restore normal body functions or as determined by the Quality
Assurance Committee of the HMO;


C. Except as noted below, services related the care, filling, removal or
replacement of teeth, and to the treatment of injuries or to diseases of the
teeth or gums. Examples of excluded services are (but not limited to)
apicoectomy (dental root resection); orthodontics; root canal treatment; soft
tissue impactions; tempomandibular joint dysfunction examination, evaluation and
treatment, alveolectomy and treatment of periodontal disease.


The only dental services included for coverage are the surgical removal of
impacted teeth which are partially or completely covered by bone.


D. Experimental medical, surgical or other experimental health care procedures,
unless approved by HMO. (Only HMO Members are covered for services provided in
the case of a covered transplant.);


E. Treatment of disabilities from diseases contracted or injuries sustained as a
result of military service or war, declared or undeclared, or any act of war,
for which the Member is legally entitled to services at governmental facilities,
and for which facilities are reasonably available;


F. Treatment of mental retardation, defects and deficiencies, except for those
short-term outpatient evaluative and crisis intervention mental health services
provided for in Section E.1. - Benefits and Services. This provision does not
apply to medical treatment of retarded Members in accordance with the terms and
provisions of this Contract;


G. Care for conditions that state or local law requires to be treated in a
public facility;


H. Provision of blood, blood plasma, or blood derivatives and the cost of
securing the services of professional blood donors (administration of blood is
covered);


I. Immunizations for the purpose of fulfilling requirements for international
travel;


J. Provision of and instruction in the use of hearing aids, arch supports,
corsets, cervical collars, traction apparatus, TENS unit, elastic hose,
corrective shoes, canes, walkers, wheelchairs, crutches, braces or other special
appliances, supples or equipment. However, original provision of prosthetic
appliances (except false teeth) and orthopedic braces used to treat congenital
defects, is covered. Replacement of these items are not covered;


K. Provision of personal convenience items or services such as barber services,
guest meals, radio and television rentals, and other like items and services;


L. Custodial or domiciliary care, research studies, experimental treatment, rest
cures or weight reduction programs not medically necessary and certified as such
by Member's Participating Primary Physician;


6 of 7





M. Drugs, except as specifically provided in Section D.1. - Benefits and
Services.


N. Special medical reports not directly related to treatment. Also appearances
at hearings and court proceedings.


O. Private or special duty nurses, except as provided in Section D.1. - Benefits
and Services; or as specifically approved in advance by HMO;


P. Surgery to the feet, except where prior written approval has been obtained,
after review from the Quality Assurance Committee of HMO. This review shall
include, at a minimum, analysis of x-rays made by a Board Certified or Board
Eligible radiologist together with any other documents deemed necessary by the
Quality Assurance Committee;


Q. Treatment for chronic alcoholism and drug addiction, except as provided in

Section E - Benefits and Services;


R. Speech therapy except as provided in Section E.3. - Benefits and Services;


S. Reversal of voluntarily induced infertility;


T. Transsexual surgery;


U. Routine reduction of nails, callouses and corns which are not medically
necessary;


V. Those services described in paragraph 22 of this Health Care Services
Agreement "Directives for Catholic Institutions."


HMO reserves the right to amend Attachment A as necessary to reflect changes
required by state and federal law. HMO will notify Provider at least thirty (30)
days prior to the effective date of such amendments and will adjust compensation
to Provider in a mutually agreed upon fashion.


7 of 7






ATTACHMENT B

TO THE

HEALTH CARE SERVICES AGREEMENT




COMPENSATION



Provider:          Partners In Care, Corp.


Effective Date:          July 1, 1995



Compensation:



Subject to the qualifications herein, and in Paragraph 3 of this Agreement, upon
the enrollment of 5,000 Members with Partners in Care primary care physicians,
U.S. Healthcare will reimburse Partners In Care, Inc., (Provider) the
percentages of Premium set forth below for each of the 5,000 or more enrollees.
For purposes of this agreement, "Premium" shall be defined as the product's
revenue requirement as filed with the State of New Jersey Department of
Insurance, as amended from time to time. This rate is for primary, specialty
and hospital services, as described in Attachment A, provided to Members
who enroll with Partners In Care Inc., primary care offices, in accordance
with this Agreement.


72% for commercial products

76% for Medicare products

75% for Medicaid products (Family Care)


The Partners in Care percent of the premium for the commercial products shall
increase by 1/2 percentage point for each percentage point decrease in the
revenue requirement as filed with the State of New Jersey Department of
Insurance, up to a maximum of 75%.


The above notwithstanding, Partners in Care's percentage of premium, shall
never be less than HMO's Medical Loss Ratio for Northern New Jersey, as filed
with the State of New Jersey Department of Insurance, over the identical
time span. For these purposes and for purposes of reconciliation, premium
requirement and claims paid shall include premium and claims paid as part of a
point of service program offering HMO benefits in conjunction with indemnity
benefits offered by an HMO affiliated insurance company.



Exclusions:



Provider will not be responsible to provide the following services as defined in
Attachment A:


Mental Health. Substance Abuse, and the various services described in
section 22.


HMO's per member per month costs for the above excluded services, developed
along actuarially sound guidelines, will be deducted from the revenue
requirement defined above prior to the determination of the reconciliation
percentage.


The services to be excluded from the percent of premium, and the actuarially
developed value of said services, may be amended in writing at any time with the
approval of both parties.






Professional Services:



The services provided by Provider's specialist physicians for members referred
by other than Provider's primary care offices will be paid in accordance with
the fee schedule contained in the Specialist Physician Agreement.


Hospital services, including those certain services performed by hospital based
physicians which are included in the hospital rates, provided for members other
than those that are enrolled with Provider's Primary care offices will be paid
in accordance with the rates contained in the Managed Care Agreement between HMO
and St. Peter's Medical Center. Other services performed by hospital based
physicians, and not included in the hospital rates under the Managed Care
Agreement, will be paid in accordance with the Specialist Physician Agreement
fee schedule.


All claims for outpatient services (anything other than inpatient) must be
submitted with the appropriate procedure code as published in the AMA Physicians
Current Procedural Terminology ("CPT"). Procedures which are an integral part of
the primary procedure will be considered as necessary adjuncts, not separate
procedures for which additional reimbursement is justified. If HMO determines
that certain services , which were billed separately by Provider, are an
integral part of the primary procedure, HMO will provide Provider with the
standard applied by HMO in making this determination. The payment and bundling
decisions are developed along actuarially sound guidelines.



Reconciliation:



Financial reconciliation of the Health Care Services Agreement will take place
on a preliminary basis approximately six months after the close of the relevant
contract year with final reconciliation thirteen (13) months after the close of
the relevant contract year. Reconciliation will be to the financial terms
outlined above. Any sum due to either party, as determined by the reconciliation
shall be paid within thirty (30) days of the final reconciliation. Both parties
shall supply or make available, in a timely fashion, the documents and records
necessary to accomplish this reconciliation, including but not limited to those
set forth in paragraphs 5 and 19 of this Agreement.








ATTACHMENT C

TO THE

HEALTH CARE SERVICES AGREEMENT




ROSTER OF PRIMARY CARE PHYSICIAN OFFICES







      Provider:       Partners In Care, Corp.
Effective Date:       July 1, 1995


                             To be attached












ATTACHMENT D

TO THE

HEALTH CARE SERVICES AGREEMENT




DEFINITIONS



Provider:       Partners In Care, Corp.


Effective Date:       July 1, 1995


When used in this Agreement, all capitalized terms shall have the following
meanings:


1 Affiliates. USHC and its parent, subsidiary and other affiliate companies and
any cooperating Payor identified in a Plan.


2 Covered Services. Those Medically Necessary Services which are to be provided
to Member under the terms and conditions of the applicable Plan.


3 Emergency Services. Medically Necessary Services to preserve life or stabilize
health, available on an inpatient or outpatient basis, 24 hours a day, seven
days a week.


4 Medically Necessary Services. Health care services that are appropriate and
consistent with the diagnosis in accordance with accepted medical standards and
which are likely to result in demonstrable medical benefit, and which are the
least costly of alternative supplies or levels of service which can be safely
and effectively provided to the patient. Medically Necessary Services do not
include custodial or supportive care or rest cures, or services or supplies
provided for the convenience of the patient, the patient's family, or the
provider. When used in relation to hospital inpatient care, Medically Necessary
Services only include those services and supplies that cannot be safely and
satisfactorily provided at home, in a physician's office, as an outpatient
service, or in a lesser facility. Medically Necessary Services must be related
to diagnosis or treatment of an existing illness or injury, except for
preventive and well baby care. Health services are not Medically Necessary if
they are experimental services.


5 Member. A person who is currently enrolled in a fully insured Plan and has
selected a PIC Primary Care Physician.


6 Participating Provider. Any physician, hospital, skilled nursing facility, or
other individual or entity involved in the delivery of health care or ancillary
services who has entered into and continues to have a current valid contract
with PIC to provide Covered Services to Members, and which is a participant in
the specific Plan in which the Member is enrolled.





7 Payor. USHC or any other third party payor, including, but not limited to, an
insurance company, self-insured group contract holder, or third party
administrator that has entered into an agreement with USHC for the provision of
Covered Services through Participating Providers.


8 Primary Care Services. Those Covered Services to be provided to Members by
Primary Care Physician under the terms and conditions of the applicable Plan.


9 Plan. Any product or plan offered by USHC or another Payor which utilizes
Participating Providers to provide Covered Services to Members under the terms
and conditions described in the applicable Plans, including but not limited to
PPO, Medicaid, Medicare and Workers' Compensation. Certain of such Plans may be
self-funded (non-insured) in nature, under which an employer and not USHC is
obligated to pay Physician.


10 Proprietary Information. The information developed by or belonging to
Partners in Care or USHC or any third party payor including, but not limited to,
mailing lists, patient lists, employer lists, USHC rates and procedures,
product related information and structure, utilization review procedures,
formats and structure and related information and documents concerning USHC's
planning structure, systems and operation of its Plans.






EXHIBIT 1.

TO THE

HEALTH CARE SERVICES AGREEMENT




SAMPLE ENROLLMENT FORM/CONSENT TO RELEASE

OF MEDICAL INFORMATION



Provider:       Partners In Care, Corp.


Effective Date:       July 1, 1995








PLEASE READ INSTRUCTIONS ON REVERSE SIDE

BEFORE COMPLETING THIS FORM, PRINT CLEARLY.




PLAN OPTIONS (CHECK 1)







1  [ ] PREMIER      [ ] PATRIOT'sm'V   [ ] PATRIOT'sm'X   [ ] PATRIOT'sm'XV   [ ] VALUE PLUS'sm'   [ ] SUPER VALUE PLUS'sm'
   [ ] VERSATILE'sm' PLAN     [ ] CHOICE OF EXCELLENCE'sm' PLAN        [ ] CITIZEN PLAN      [ ] CHARTER PLAN     [ ] OTHER


[US HEALTHCARE LOGO]                  1425 Union Meeting Road                                U.S. HEALTHCARE'r' ID NO.
                                      P.O. Box 3013                                  --------------------------------
                                      Blue Bell, PA 19422
                                      1-800-323-9930
                                                                                     --------------------------------














Enrollment Form

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
2                          EMPLOYEE INFORMATION
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
LAST NAME, FIRST NAME, M.I.                            SOCIAL SECURITY NO.

                                                                -      -
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
HOME ADDRESS                                           APT. NO.

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
CITY, STATE                           ZIP CODE         HOME TELEPHONE
                                                       (   )
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
EMPLOYER NAME                                          WORK TELEPHONE
                                                       (   )
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
WORK ADDRESS                          ZIP CODE         DATE OF HIRE

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------


--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
3                           TYPE OF ACTIVITY
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 [ ] NEW SUBSCRIBER                         [ ] CHANGE USHC PLAN TO
 [ ] ADD/REMOVE SPOUSE
     REASON                                     ----------------------------
           -----------------------------    [ ] CHANGE PRIMARY OR GYN OFFICE
     DATE OF EVENT                              (FILL IN SECTIONS 4 AND 5 BELOW)
                  ----------------------
 [ ] ADD/REMOVE A DEPENDENT CHILD           [ ] ADD/CHANGE PRIMARY DENTIST
     REASON                                     (FILL IN SECTIONS 4 AND 5 BELOW)
           -----------------------------
     DATE OF EVENT                          [ ] ADD/CHANGE PHARMACY
                  ----------------------        (FILL IN SECTIONS 4 AND 5 BELOW)
 [ ] NAME CHANGE FROM
                      ------------------    [ ] WITHDRAWAL/TERMINATION
                                                (SEE SECTION 8 BELOW)
     -----------------------------------














-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
4             NO.   ADD   REMOVE          LAST NAME, FIRST NAME, M.I.      SEX      DATE OF BIRTH    SOCIAL SECURITY NO.
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
EMPLOYEE      1    [ ]     [ ]                                           M   F          /    /          -     -
                                                                        [ ] [ ]
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
SPOUSE        2    [ ]     [ ]                                           M   F          /    /          -     -
                                                                        [ ] [ ]
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
CHILDREN      3    [ ]     [ ]                                           M   F         /    /          -     -
                                                                        [ ] [ ]
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 ATTACH SHEET 4    [ ]     [ ]                                           M   F         /    /          -     -
 TO LIST                                                                [ ] [ ]
 ADDITIONAL -------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 CHILDREN

 ATTACH PROOF 5    [ ]     [ ]                                           M   F         /    /          -     -
 IF FULL-TIME                                                           [ ] [ ]
 COLLEGE   -------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 STUDENT      6    [ ]     [ ]                                           M   F         /    /          -     -
                                                                        [ ] [ ]
------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------














---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
                      PRIMARY               GYN              PHARMACY               DENTIST
 5          CHANGE   OFFICE NO.          OFFICE NO.             NO.                OFFICE NO.
---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 1           [ ]
---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 2           [ ]
---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 3           [ ]
---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 4           [ ]
---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 5           [ ]
---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 6           [ ]
---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------














-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 6                                             OTHER INSURANCE
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
IS YOUR SPOUSE EMPLOYED?     [ ] YES     IF YES, PLEASE GIVE NAME AND ADDRESS OF SPOUSE'S EMPLOYER.
                             [ ] NO
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
DOES YOUR SPOUSE HAVE        [ ] YES     IF YES, PLEASE GIVE NAME AND POLICY NO. OF INSURANCE CARRIER OR OTHER HMO.
HEALTH INSURANCE?            [ ] NO
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                         IF YES, WHO IS COVERED BY THIS POLICY?
                                         [ ] YOURSELF    [ ] YOURSELF AND SPOUSE    [ ] SPOUSE ONLY    [ ] ENTIRE FAMILY
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------














-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 7                                          DEPENDENT INFORMATION
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
DO ANY OF THE DEPENDENT'S LISTED IN SECTION 4 LIVE AT ANOTHER ADDRESS?    [ ] YES
                                                                          [ ] NO
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
IF YES, WHO AND AT WHAT ADDRESS?

-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
EXPLAIN THE CIRCUMSTANCES.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
IF ANY DEPENDENT'S LAST NAME IS DIFFERENT FROM YOURS, EXPLAIN THE CIRCUMSTANCES.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------














--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
8                   WITHDRAWAL FROM PLAN
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
[ ]  NO LONGER IN GROUP                        DATE OF WITHDRAWAL

[ ]  INDIVIDUAL CONVERSION--BILL ME AT HOME    ---------------------------------
     (PRESCRIPTION AND DENTAL BENEFITS ARE NOT CONVERTIBLE)

[ ]  I DECLINE NONGROUP COVERAGE

NOTE: FOR COBRA INFORMATION--SEE YOUR EMPLOYER.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------










9                           EMPLOYEE SIGNATURE




I REPRESENT THAT ALL THE INFORMATION SUPPLIED IN THIS APPLICATION IS TRUE AND
COMPLETE. I HEREBY AGREE TO THE CONDITIONS OF ENROLLMENT ON THE REVERSE SIDE OF
THE EMPLOYEE COPY OF THIS APPLICATION.







SUBSCRIBER SIGNATURE                                      DATE





EMPLOYEE COPY MAY BE USED AS A TEMPORARY ID CARD FOR 30 DAYS FROM THE EFFECTIVE
DATE AUTHORIZED BY EMPLOYER. COVERAGE MUST BE VERIFIED WITH U.S. HEALTHCARE
PRIOR TO REFERRAL TO A SPECIALIST OR ADMISSION TO A HOSPITAL.







-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
10                                            EMPLOYER VERIFICATION
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
GROUP NAME                   GROUP NO            SIGNATURE               TITLE                 EFFECTIVE DATE OF COVERAGE

-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                                                 'c' 1993 U.S. Healthcare, Inc. 8131-2/93












ENROLLMENT FORM INSTRUCTIONS




COMPLETE ALL SECTIONS EXCEPT SECTION 8 IF YOU ARE:



1. Enrolling as a new subscriber.

2. Changing dependent coverage.

3. Adding dental or prescription coverage.


COMPLETE SECTIONS 1, 2, 3, 6, AND 9 IF YOU ARE SWITCHING U.S. HEALTHCARE PLANS.
COMPLETE SECTIONS 2, 3, 8, AND 9 IF YOU ARE TERMINATING YOUR U.S. HEALTHCARE
COVERAGE.


Section  1 -- If you are offered more than one plan option by your employer, you
must select a plan option or your enrollment form cannot be
processed.


Section  2 -- Complete all information.


Section  3 -- Check box(es) indicating reason(s) for submitting form (i.e., new
enrollment, coverage change, name change, withdrawal).


Section  4 -- Print your full name along with the name(s) of your dependents(s),
if any. Provide sex, date of birth, and social security number for
each individual listed. If a dependent is a full-time college
student, you must attach a current course schedule or tuition
receipt. The add/remove blocks should be checked only if you wish
to add or remove a dependent from the plan.


Section  5 -- From the appropriate directory, choose the location number for a
primary physician (required for all members), GYN (if applicable),
pharmacy (if applicable), and dentist (if applicable). Check the
change block only if you are changing providers.


Section  6 -- This section must be completed for all new enrollments or coverage
changes.


Section  7 -- Complete this section for all new enrollments or coverage changes.


Section  8 -- FOR TERMINATION ONLY. Complete this section only if the
"withdrawal" box has been checked in Section 3.


Section  9 -- Employee must sign and date this form for any activity or it will
not be processed.


Section 10 -- To be completed by the employer's benefit representative. Please
ensure that all information is clearly marked and correctly filled
out.



CONDITIONS OF ENROLLMENT



On behalf of myself and the dependents listed on the reverse side, I agree to
the following:


1. Enrollment of myself and of the listed dependents into the plan shall be
effective on acceptance by U.S. Healthcare.


2. Coverage and benefits are contingent on timely payment of premiums and may be
terminated as provided in the Group Master Contract. Employer is hereby
authorized to withhold premium payments from applicant's wages as
appropriate.


3. As a condition to benefits, applicant understands and agrees that (with the
exception of emergency procedures as defined in the Group Master Contract)
all services, in order to be covered by U.S. Healthcare, must be performed
either by a participating primary care physician or by the participating
specialists, hospital, pharmacy, dentist, or other provider as authorized by
prior written referral forma participating primary care physician.


4. Applicant agrees to make directly to providers of health care such copayments
as are provided for in the Group Master Contract.


5. Applicant authorizes any hospital, physician, or other health care provider
to furnish U.S. Healthcare or its assignee or designee with such medical
information about the applicant and of the listed dependents at U.S.
Healthcare or its assignee or designee may require.


6. The Group Master Contract will determine the rights and responsibilities of
member(s) and will govern in the event it conflicts with any benefits
comparison, summary, or other description of the HMO Plan.


7. Applicant authorizes the substitution of generic pharmaceuticals for brand
name products, as provided by law, for prescriptions filled under any
pharmacy benefit rider.


8. Applicant understands that this coverage will remain in effect until the
employer's next open enrollment period regardless of the continued
availability of a particular primary care physician or other health care
provider.


9. Applicant acknowledges that U.S. Healthcare's participating providers,
including all participating primary care physicians, are independent
contractors and are not agents or employees of U.S. Healthcare.






CONFIDENTIALITY AGREEMENT



THIS AGREEMENT made as of 10/1, 1999 by and between Aetna US Healthcare
on behalf of itself and its affiliates, (collectively "Company") and Partners in
Care, Corp. (hereinafter "PIC").


WHEREAS, Company and a provider represented by PIC ("Provider") are
currently engaged in discussions about the possible development of an agreement
wherein Provider will provide programs and services for enrollees of Company's
plans; and


WHEREAS, such discussions between Company and Provider may necessitate
Company to disclose certain confidential and proprietary information to PIC; and


WHEREAS, Company desires to protect such information and PIC agrees to
protect such information under the terms and conditions set forth hereunder.


NOW, therefore, intending to be legally bound hereby, the parties agree as
follows:


1.   For the propose of this Agreement, the terms "Confidential Information"
shall mean all information, whether prepared by the Company, its advisors
or otherwise, relating to Company or the development of the Definitive
Agreement including but not limited to the development of a pricing
structure, whether written or oral, including without limitation all
financial information, rate schedules and financial terms which relate to
Provider and which is furnished or disclosed to PIC in connection with the
aforementioned negotiations and which is furished to PIC upon and after
the effective date hereof. Confidential Information does not include
information which becomes available to PIC on a non confidential basis from
a source other than the Company or its advisors, provided that such
information is not know by PIC to be proprietary or such source is not
known by PIC to be bound by a confidentiality agreement with or other
obligation of secrecy to the Company or another party. PIC agrees that
Company's rate and financial information shall be deemed to be proprietary
and confidential hereunder, except as agreed to in writing by Company to
PIC.


2.   PIC shall not, in any manner or for any reason whatsoever, directly, or
indirectly, (a) use all or any portion of the Confidential Information for
any purpose other than solely for the evaluation of and consultation with
Provider in connection with discussions between Provider and Company, (b)
except as set forth herein, disclose or otherwise make available in any
manner or form to any person or entity all or any portion of the
Confidential Information, including with limitation, for any purpose
relating to the business or affairs of PIC or any related person or entity,
or (c) take any action or fail to take or abstain from taking any action
the effect of which would cause Confidential Information to be disclosed or
otherwise made available in a manner inconsistent with PIC's obligations
herein.


3.   PIC may disclose Confidential Information to its employees, contractors,
agents, advisors and representative only on a need-to-know basis, provided
that PIC shall (a) direct such persons to use such information solely for
the purpose described in Paragraph 2; (b) inform such persons of the
confidential nature of such information; and (c) direct and cause such
persons to treat such information confidentially as required of PIC herein;
and provided further that PIC shall provide Company prompt written notice,
upon Company's request, of all such persons to whom such information was
disclosed.


4.   Upon Company's request or in the event an agreement between Provider and
Company is not executed, PIC shall promptly return to Company all written
material containing or reflecting any Confidential Information. The return
of such material shall not relieve PIC of its obligations hereunder. In any
event, PIC shall and will not retain any copies, extracts or other
reproductions in whole or in part of such written material. All documents,
memoranda, notes and other writings whatsoever prepared by PIC or its
advisors based on the information in the Confidential Information shall be
destroyed, and such destruction shall be certified in writing to the
Company, upon Company" request, by an authorized officer supervising such
destruction.





5.   The parties hereby agree and acknowledge that Company operates in a highly
competitive market; any breach of this Agreement would have an adverse
financial effect on Company and will cause irreparable harm and significant
injury which will be difficult to measure with certainty or to compensate
through damages, and that any remedies provided at law to Company cannot
adequately compensate Company for the losses to be sustained by Company in
the event of a breach or violation by PIC of any of the provisions of this
Agreement. Accordingly, in addition to all other rights and remedies
available to it, Company shall be entitled as a matter of right to
injunctive and other equitable relief in any court of competent
jurisdiction.


6.   PIC understands that neither the Company nor any of its representatives or
advisors have made or make any representation r warranty as to the accuracy
or completeness of the Confidential Information. PIC agrees that neither
the Company nor its representatives or advisors shall have any liability to
PIC or any of its representatives or advisors resulting from the use of the
Confidential Information.


7.   The rights and obligations set forth in the Agreement shall survive the
termination of this Agreement and discussions between Provider and Company
in any event.


8.   NOTICES: Any notice required to be given pursuant to the terms and
provisions hereof shall be in writing and shall be sent by certified or
registered mail to PIC at:



and to Company at:



Aetna U.S. Healthcare, Inc.

Attn: Contracts Management


9.   This agreement shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the
laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania. PIC and Company agree that any
action brought under this Agreement shall be exclusively brought in the
courts of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, Montgomery County, it being
acknowledged that Company maintains its headquarters in said county and
that this agreement will be executed by Company in said county. PIC
irrevocably consents to the personal jurisdiction of the courts of the
Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.


IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have executed this agreement as of
the day and year above mentioned.





Partners in Care, Corp.




By: Dennis Wilson









Title:       CEO
      -------------------

Date:      10/26/99
     --------------------









Company




By:






Title:






Date:










BROKERAGE PARTNERS


































© 1995-2017
EDGAR Online, Inc.
All rights reserved  NASDAQ:
EDGR 
Solutions for Corporations  
Terms of Use  
Privacy Statement













Partners In Care

























 






Partners In Care






Home
About
Leadership
Clients & Services
Provider Network
News
Contact Us


Delivering Better Health, Better Care at Lower Cost...

             









Home







 Results 




 Provider Spotlight 




 Testimonials 
























 © 2013 Partners In Care | 2 Tower Center Blvd., Tower 2, 12th Floor East Brunswick, NJ 08816 | Phone:  (732) 246 0291 | Fax: (732) 745 4798 




 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.


















Bing Places for Business
























































































































Bing
 places for business


Sign in using your




Microsoft Account





Work Account





Google Account





Facebook Account

Don't have an account? Create one.


